CHAPTER I.
The Concealed Ship.
The
opening scene of our story is laid in the Mediterranean Sea in the
month of June, 1700. One clear, cloudless morning, towards the latter end
of this month, the rising sun, himself yet unseen beneath the ocean, was
just touching the skyey outline of the bold summits of the Corsican Sierras
with a bright edge of gold. As each moment he rose higher and higher, the
darkness fled from the hollows and coverts of the mountain-sides into the
sea, revealing first the towers and turrets of a convent perched upon a
pinnacle
;
then, lower down, a walled monastery with its hanging gardens; then
a fortress with battlements and embrasures frowning above the waves; and
still lower, on the very verge of the sea, the hut of the fisherman! As the
bays and inlets caught the morning beams, the fisher's light craft with its
long latteen yard across was seen idly anchored near his door, or sluggishly
getting underweigh and moving under oars towards the open sea. In one
of the inlets of the cliff-bound shore, into which the beams of the morning
penetrated, lay moored close in with the towering rock, a large vessel of
about four hundred tons. The little bay in which she was sheltered, was
about two leagues to the northward of a considerable port on the east side
of the Island of Corsica; half a league from her position was a convent
surrounded by high and snow-white walls; and on the mountain side,
almost
above her, stood a monastery half in ruins, yet inhabited. Perched
here and there upon a low, rocky projection stood a solitary fisherman's cot,
and the jagged peaks of the Sierras, elevated in the distance, formed a bold
back-ground to the scene. The vessel in question seemed to have taken up
the most advantageous position within the inlet for security, not only from
any sudden storm, but from the observation of any vessels which sailed past
outside; for unless they fairly entered the narrow bay, and turned sharp to
the left, they could not have discovered that it contained any thing besides
the half a score of fishing boats which usually belonged in its waters.
This vessel had run into this hiding place about midnight, standing in
with a bold helm as if familiar with the passage, though it had no other light
to guide her than the stars, which could scarcely penetrate the black
shadows
of the towering rocks that overhung the water in her progress. Yet
she moved steadily, now putting her helm a little up to avoid a rock which
could hardly be distinguished from the shadows in which it was enveloped,
now keeping away to give a birth to a jutting spur; till at length she
rounded
a sharp precipice, against which her yards swept and dropped anchor
behind it, where she lay as if locked in a basin without any outlet. The
gun, therefore, had risen and gilded the waves as well as the mountain tops
without hull or spar of the shaded vessel reflecting his beams.
As the early rising monk from his convent walls glanced down and
beheld
the stranger his features expressed his surprise at the sight; and ho
lingered long after the bell for matins had ceased tolling to watch her with
a curious eye. The vine-dresser as he moved toward his upland vineyards
stopped in mid-path to wonder why a large vessel should be hiding behind
the rocks of his secluded bay; and the fisherman, as he weighed the anchor
of his humble craft, gave the stranger a cautious glance, and pulled wide
from her anchorage towards his fishing ground; for it was seldom that
vessels
ever entered the inlet; the port of the island being only two leagues
distant, and in case of a storm afforded secure shelter, as well as being
easily
entered. The inlet on the contrary was narrow and would prove
dangerous
in a storm to any one that should seek its shelter unless perfectly
acquainted
with its navigation. But there had been no storm. The night
preceding had been pleasant and the waters smooth; and yet in the
morning
a large four-masted
Galleon
is found anchored within the bowl-like
bay of `El Gancho!'
Leaving the curious monk, the wondering vine-dresser and the suspicious
fisherman, to solve at their leisure the mystery of this unusual visit to their
retirement, we will proceed to describe her appearance as the opening day
revealed her shape and proportions. She was a large Spanish Galleon, a
ship of very different construction from any of the present day. Her hull
was a sort of butter-boat shape, curved towards the bows and stern like a
new moon. The stern was very lofty and projecting, and seemed composed
of two or three stories, each ornamented with heavy carved work profusely
covered with gilding. The bows were also extravagantly high and
rounded
,
and adorned with a group of statues, large as life, representing Ariadne
coming out of the sea, mounted upon a golden dolphin and attended by a
troop of nereids in golden locks and green robes. The bowsprit was short
and almost perpendicular, looking like a
fifth
mast. Her top-gallant,
forecastle
and her poop, were full eighteen feet from the main deck, and a sort
of draw-bridge led from one to the other fore and aft. She carried twenty
four guns, sixteen of them on the main-deck, eight to a side, and the
balance
were arranged in batteries upon the lofty poop and bows, four forward
and four aft. The gun carriages were of mahogany and carved with
warlike
visages. The ship had four masts; that abaft the mizen being set in
the oaken taffrail and
stepped
in a large timber that jutted out like a davit
from the main deck, on the end of which was carved a Neptune's head,
with blue hair and a gilded beard. On this mast was carried a sail, now
known by seamen as a `driver.' It could also carry a topsail-driver hoisted
above the other. The remaining three masts were rigged pretty much like
those of ships of the present day, only with more awkward yards and
less beauty and symmetry in the hamper and canvass. Her fore-yard
had been shot away, and the main-topmast was splintered; while shot
sticking
in the sides of the vessel showed that she had recently been in action.
Her principal sails were now all furled; but her lighter canvass was only
brailed up as if ready to be used. As the day broke upon this huge, carved
and gilded `galleon' of the olden time, there was apparent on board no
inconsiderable
bustle and excitement. There stood upon her lofty poop a
stout old officer, in a gorgeous Spanish naval uniform and a cocked hat,
with a sword in his hand. He was surrounded by several officers, some of
them mere youths, but all richly dressed in splendid uniforms. The main
deck was crowded with the men of the vessel; and all countenances
seemed
to show mingled fear and expectation. As soon as the day dawned an
officer had ascended the rigging from the deck and thrown himself lightly
upon a shelf of the rock, and thence clambered to its summit which
overlooked
the sea. From time to time as the light increased, he called out
from his post to the deck of the galleon beneath him,
`
Nada en vista!
'
The old officer would answer back at these reports of `nothing in sight,'
and say earnestly in sonorous Spanish.
`Keep a close out! Don't let them see you!' He would then pace up
and down his deck half-a-dozen steps, stop short, look at his lieutenant, and
exclaim with a sort of despair,
`
Maldilo!
What shall we do? What is to be done?' Then without
waiting
for a reply he would pace the poop between a narrow line formed by
his few officers, who were gathered round him as perplexed as himself.
`If he discovers us here, we are lost,' answered his chief lieutenant, a
handsome young Spanish noble; `unless,' he added, `we can make a
battery
of our ship and sink him if he ventures in, or die bravely at our guns!'
`You speak like a brave man and a true Spaniard, Don Julio,' said the
old grey-whiskered Capitan of the galleon, shaking his head. `Our only
hope is in his not discovering us! The day is opening, and we shall soon
learn if he is in sight!'
`
Nada vista!
' called the officer from the rock, as the sun began to lay a
thread of gold upon the skyey edges of the mountains.
`Can you see the horizon all around?' shouted the Spanish captain.
`All is clear seaward and to the south. To the north, four miles off, the
promontory of La Nez juts out so far that I cannot discover what is beyond
it. But there is no wind, and whatever is hid by it will lie there!'
`So it will,' answered the Capitan rubbing his hands and looking at his
lieutenant. `Now let us consult what is to be done, while the calm holds.
But first let me question this
pescador
who piloted us in here so skilfully.
Jose?' he called to a short, dark visaged man, in the ordinary costume of a
Corsican fisherman. The man came aft and removing his cap waited to be
addressed. `Is there any other outlet to this bay than that you brought me
in by last night?'
`No, senor!'
`How far are we from the port of St. Ana?'
The man fixing his large, expressive eyes on the officer, replied, `Two
leagues, senor, to the south.'
`Two leagues! Then why in the name of St. James didn't you let me
know it last night, and I could have run for that port instead of putting into
this punch bowl. We could have reached it in an hour more?'
`True, senor capitan,' answered the pilot. `But when last night you took
me from my boat as I was fishing, and said you were chased by a
freebooter
,
and asked me if there was any shelter on the coast, I told your
excellency
of this; for I knew St. Ana was no safe-port; and I knew you might lie
here in security, if you could reach it without being seen by your enemy.'
`But I should have been safer in the Port. You should have told me it
was so nigh at hand. I thought it was at least ten leagues. Under the guns
of its fort we would have defied this `King of the Ocean,' as he arrogantly
calls himself.'
`This pirate would have more easily taken your ship, senor, from under
the guns of the fort at St. Ana than from the basin. He has twice cut
vessels
out of that harbor in open day. It affords no shelter. He would have
seen you lying in the port, and nothing would have kept him from
capturing
you. It is impossible he should find you in this concealment.'
`Well, you have done your duty, pescador! I find no fault. You shall
be rewarded with gold. Now, Don Julio, what shall be done?'
`There is no question, senor, but that the pirate will continue to pursue
us. He was but twelve miles astern at sun-down, and by that time we saw
with the glass he had got up another foremast in place of that we shot away
five hours before!'
`There was no doubt that he was standing on again when night set in;
and it is my opinion if Carlos, aloft on the rock, could look over the Nez
headland, he would see the freebooters' brig working her way along
somehow
or another, calm as it is!'
`This is my opinion, senor,' replied the lieutenant. `If he should appear
in the offing we have only a chance of safety in his passing on, supposing
we have run for St. Ana!'
`That is my only hope. Here comes His Excellency Don Ferdinand on
deck with his charming daughter, Senorita Ellena. We will have his
opinion
also.'
As he spoke a noble looking Spaniard appeared on deck, and advanced
towards the group. Upon his left arm leaned a lovely female about twenty
years of age, whose lofty style of countenance and stately carriage of the
person partook so much of that of the gentleman, that their near
relationship
was apparent to every eye. She was extremely beautiful. Her hair
was shining black, and arranged with taste around her classic forehead in a
band of interwoven braids, and was suffered to fall from thence in two or
three careless tresses to her graceful shoulders. Her eyes were large, black
and penetrating. The expression of her countenance was intelligent and
full of feeling. The glance of her eye was joyous yet timid; modest yet
mirthful. She was dressed in plain black velvet that closely fitted her
perfect
shape, and above her bosom shone a single diamond of wonderful
lustre
and beauty. A lace mantilla or
reboso
was fastened by a pearl to her
hair, and depending from her head was gracefully sustained like a mantle
upon one snowy arm.
`Good morning your excellency!
Felices dias
, senorita Elena!' said the
capitan, bowing; while the other officers, retiring a step or two,
respectfully
raised their chapeaus. `I am happy to see you already on deck after our
night's run! And you, senora, do not look less lovely notwithstanding the
perils we have been in.'
`I have no need to cherish fears under the protection of such brave
Spaniards
as yourself, senor capitan and your officers,' answered the lady with a
smile; then turning her eyes upon the bold shores that hung around, upon
the cliffs and towering peaks, she silently surveyed the scene like one who
felt its solemn grandeur. Her father also surveyed it for an instant with
surprise and then spoke:
`This is a wild and secret spot into which your pilot brought us last night,
senor capitan. Do you know the region!'
We are but two leagues from St. Ana.'
`It is a pity we could not have reached that port.'
`We should have been chased in and attacked under its very guns, the
fisherman tells me, and I do not doubt it; as the fort is not very strongly
armed or manned. We are safer here, your excellency; if we can lay
perdu
until the pirate passes along the coast to the south of us.'
`What? Has he been seen this morning?'
`No senor! Don Carlos is upon yonder rocky point in the air on watch!'
`And what hopes have you that he will go by? This port will first
attract
him.'
`No senor. It is frequented only by fishermen. He will never suppose
we put in here with St. Ana directly before us.'
`But
if
he should suspect?'
`Then I must defend my ship as well as I can. We are repairing our
damages here, and the leak has been found and stopped. We will be ready
for him and do our best.'
`Cannot the specie be landed at once? If we could disembark it and get
it secreted in the vicinity or secured in the town, then the loss of the vessel
would be a secondary matter. We must devise some means, senor capitan,
of securing the vast amount of silver bullion and coin we have on board.'
`It will require full twelve hours to land it, even if we could do so among
these perpendicular rocks. In the meanwhile four or five hours will decide
our fate. If this English pirate is in chase he will soon be in sight.' It is
now sun-rise, and in less than an hour a wind will breeze up which will
show him, if he is in the northern board. I will at once send a boat, your
excellency, along the shore in the direction of the head-land to see if any
thing can be seen to the sea in the north.'
`This is a wise step.'
`Senor capitan,' said the pilot, lifting his red cap,' from yonder wooded
hill, across the bay, not half a mile distant, a clear view can be had of the
open sea on the northern side. I will go with a boat's crew to that side of
the bay and ascend the hill as I am acquainted with the pathway to its
summit
.'
`Well said,
pescador
,' answered the capitan; and in a few moments a boat
with the fisherman in the stern was pulling across the little bay in the
direction
of the eminence he had pointed out.
The captain and his noble passenger, Don Ferdinand de Garcia, with the
officers, in the meanwhile continued to converse upon their situation, while
Senorita Elena was watching with admiration the arrowy course of the
receding
boat, as it shot over the glassy, black water, leaving a silvery,
shivering
line far astern.
The galleon was indeed in a perilous condition, especially when is taken
into consideration the immense value of her freight, of which her pursuers
were full aware and which they would not lightly lose the chance of
possessing
.
She was the Spanish ship `La Reine Isabel,' and bound from
Mexico
to Cadiz, though now very far out of her longitude and beyond her port.
She had left Vera Cruz sixty days before under fair auspices, with a freight
of one million of dollars in coin and bullion for the crown. A portion of
the bullion consisted of ingots of pure gold. As passengers she had Don
Ferdinand de Garcia, ex-Governor of New Spain, returning homeward with
his daughter and half a million of dollars. The galleon, like all her species,
was armed and manned like a ship of war. She had as a further
precaution
against the buccaneers that then infested the seas, sailed in company
with three other armed galleons, and all four were under convoy of a heavy
ship of the line. But in a gale off the western islands she had lost sight of
her companions, being blown far off to the southward. Alone she made
the rest of her way towards Cadiz, and came within sight of the mountains
of Spain, with the wind off shore, when a large gun brig appeared to
windward
,
hoisted the
free flag
, gave chase to her, and cut her off from her port.
The galleon was a fast sailer, and finding she could not reach Cadiz
without
fighting with a brig of sixteen guns, endeavored to run for Gibraltar.
She would have succeeded in reaching it but for a terrific `norther,' which
drove her far through the straits, and against the violence of which she
could make no resistance. All she could do was to scud before it and
suffer
it to drive her into the Mediterranean. It continued three days; but as
they lost sight of the pirate in the storm they felt willing to endure the
tempest
which had parted them. On the morning of the fourth day, the gale
having abated, they prepared to make the best of their way back to their
port, from which they were several hundred miles to the eastward, when to
their consternation they discovered a league to windward the English
pirate
brig! It was no illusion. There he was with all his spars standing,
his free flag flying, and his guns run out steering down towards the ill-fated
galleon! The only alternative was flight or fight! It was ascertained with
the glass that the enemy had, within eight, as many guns as the galleon, and
all of larger calibre. The glass also showed the capitan precisely whom he
had for his antagonist; for he could discern, besides the black flag at the
peak, the
private
signal of the pirate flying at the main, on which he could
make out a red hand grasping a red sabre, upon a white groundthe
well-known
flag of the English freebooter,
Kidd
, whose name had spread
terror
throughout every sea!
This discovery created consternation; the idea of fighting was at once
given up, and the galleon put her best foot foremost and made a run of it!
The chase continued till the afternoon of the sixth day, the pirate having
no less than seven times during this period come within reach of her guns,
and each time beaten off and crippled by the well directed fire of the stern
chasers of the galleon. All the while the galleon was running from her
port and steering only in such directions as the wind would let her. All
she desired was to keep the pirate aloof, trusting to Providence for
ultimately
escaping and reaching some Christian port. On the sixth day they had
come within sight of Corsica, near its northern shore, and as the wind was
fair the captain of the galleon resolved to make some Italian port. But
towards
afternoon the pirate, having repaired damages, overhauled him for
the eighth time, and getting within range began to open his fire. At the
first shot the fore-topmast of the galleon went by the board and she
broached
to. Her situation was for a few moments critical. The captain
hurriedly
sprung to the helm and brought the ship to her course, while thick
and fast the halls from the brig rattled against her sides and roared above
the heads of those upon the quarter deck. It was time for determined
action
,
and the Spaniards showed their skill and courage in the critical
emergency
.
Steadily and heavily they poured in their fire upon the brig, and
after a few moments they had the satisfaction of seeing her foremost fall,
cut in two by a shot ten feet from the deck! This crippled her so that she
was unable to bring another broad-side to bear upon the galleon, which
momently
increased her distance from her, though still keeping up a sharp fire
from her stern guns. The pirate unable to steer hove his vessel to, and set
to work to clean his decks of the wreck of the mast. Taking advantage of
her good fortune the galleon, without waiting to endeavor to destroy her
crippled foe, made all sail to get as far out of her company as possible. By
sun-down she had left her full four leagues astern, her hull being visible
only from aloft; but it was plain that she had then set a new foremast. It
was this discovery and the belief he would yet be pursued, that led the
captain
to take on board a fisherman to enquire of him for some secluded
harbor
,
into which he might run, in the night, with the hope of thereby eluding
the chase altogether, should the pirate continue the pursuit. The fishermen
named the bay of El Gancho, and piloted the vessel in under cover of the
night.
Thus have we accounted for the appearance of the galleon in this
secluded
Bay. Some persons, especially seamen, might call in question Capitan
Baptista's courage, wisdom and seamanship, in running into an inlet and
hiding his ship in this way behind a precipice of rocks lying between the
basin and the sea. But it was necessary he should make some port. The
carpenter had reported, after the action with the pirate, that there was a
leak which he could not discover, and which had no doubt been made by
a shot striking her under the water line. He moreover wanted provisions
and water; and for these he knew he would have to put in somewhere.
The fisherman he had taken on board had told him of this secluded inlet,
and as a last hope he determined to give him orders to take his vessel into
it, especially on learning from him the exceeding dangerous character of its
entrance, which he was assured by the man no vessel would attempt
without
being familiar with its navigation. On these accounts Don Baptista
concealed his galleon, not knowing how near he was to Santa Ana, nor
having
a chart of the Mediterranean on board, and trusting the pirate's passing
the inlet without noticing its entrance, which the fisherman told him was
not apparent from the distance a vessel would sail past on the outside.
The boat he had despatched from the galleon soon reached the opposite
shore, and the fisherman was seen ascending the side of the eminence he
had indicated. In his hand he bore a flag which he was to wave if he saw
any vessel to the north; in which case it was decided by Don Ferdinand
and the captain that the gold bullion and coin, and then as much of the
silver
ingots as could be removed, should be transferred by the crew from the
galleon to the shore, and conveyed to the monastery upon the summit of the
rock for safe keeping.
`
Nada vista!
' cried the lieutenant from his lookout. `Nothing in sight!'
At the same instant, while his voice was yet echoing among the rocks,
from the height across the basin, the fisherman was seen to wave his flag
thrice! the signal that a sail was in the northern board.
CHAPTER II.
The Strange Sail.
The
signal made by the fisherman at once produced the strongest
excitement
on board the galleon. He waved the flag again three times, and then
was seen rapidly to descend the mountain towards the boat. He had no
sooner leaped into it, than it put off towards the ship; the rowers pulling
in the most vigorous manner.
`There is no doubt we are in for it Don Julio,' said Captain Baptista,
looking at his first lieutenant. `The vessel seen by the pescador can be no
other than that of the English corsair. But he can have no wind yet and
must be lying still upon the water. In the meanwhile we must prepare for
all emergencies.'
`The bullion must be first removed,' said Don Ferdinand. `There is a
landing of white sand at the foot of the precipice just beyond that group of
olive trees growing in that crevice; and from the sand I discern a path
leading
doubtless to the monastery on the height. Let the sailors land it there.'
`The place must first be examined, your excellency,' answered the
captain
.
If it should not be a path and we land the silver, we shall only place
it there for this corsair Kidd easier to take possession of. I have hopes,
however, as this inlet cannot be seen from outside, that we shall lay here
undisturbed. Then if he goes by he will probably steer for St. Ana and
along the coast after us; while we can make the best of our way into
Genoa
,
which is not two days sail from here. There we can wait till a ship
of the line from Spain comes to convoy us back to our port.'
`I will go myself in a boat and examine this landing,' said Don Ferdinand.
`I am not only interested in saving the bullion, but in the safety of my
daughter
.
I would know if in the last extremities there is a means of retreating
from the ship and gaining the monastery.'
`In the meanwhile, your excellency, `I will put the galleon in the best
condition possible to give this freebooter a good reception, should he scent
out our hiding place and venture in here.'
`If he suspects we are here he will venture in, we may rest satisfied,' said
Julio: `I am told he is as bold as he is successful, knows no fear and never
counts odds!'
`It is a pity the seas were not well rid of him,' said his excellency.
`Do you know of any one who has ever seen him, senor capitan?' asked
Dona Elena with a glow of interest.
`Not I, nor do I wish to see him myself,' answered Capitan Baptista with
a Castillian shrug of his shoulders.
`I know a person, senorita, who knew him, having been taken prisoner
by him,' said Julio, the lieutenant, fixing his handsome eyes admiringly
upon
the face of the beautiful Spanish maiden.
`And did he escape from his hands?' she asked earnestly.
`No, he was liberated. The corsair had captured his ship and taken from
it all that was of value and thus released him, giving him a piece of gold
stamped with a hand holding a sword, to show that he had once fallen into
his hands, and that henceforth he should never suffer capture or injury by
him or his captains!'
`Yes, I am told he gives three pieces of stamped gold to those he has
robbed,' said Capitan Baptista. The Holy Virgin forbid it should ever be
my lot to have a present of one!'
`How did your friend say this bold Corsair looked?' enquired Dona
Elena
.
`I have heard he was young and noble in person, as also in birth.'
`There is no question but he belongs to a good family in England,' said
Julio. `He was at one period a commander in their navy; but being
entrusted
in the Indian seas with certain large treasures to transport from that
country to England he proved treacherous to the trust and appropriated
them. He then hoisted the free flag upon his ship and took the seas for his
field of adventure. He has since then made every sea familiar with his
terrible
name, and although he has repeatedly lost his ships by wreck, fire and
battle, he seems himself possessed of a charmed life and prosperous
fortune
.
At times he has had as many as seven sail under his command, and
other times he has been reduced to a small schooner.'
`He is now in a brig,' observed the captain, `and I fear before night will
be promoted to a ship! But we can do our best!'
`Did your friend describe him!' asked Dona Elena again of the young
lieutenant.
`Your pardon, senora. He described him thus: a man about eight and
thirty, under sized, with a compact, well knit frame, surmounted by a large
yet finely shaped head, covered with black locks. These swept his broad,
firm shoulders, and his raven beard swept his breast. He had a high
forehead
,
commanding in its aspect, and brows large and projecting, and deeply
shading eyes of the most determined fire and energy of expression. His
nose was aquiline and his mouth finely chiselled, and indicative of great
bravery; yet at times it could wear a smile of exceeding amenity. My friend
further added that he had a small and graceful hand, of which he was
exceedingly
vain, and which was always heavily loaded with the most costly
rings. In his costume he was rather rude than gallant, being attired in a
plain gray velvet doublet, and a short cloak of blue Flanders cloth without
lace. He wore usually a British marine hat, with the broad brim flapping
down at the sides, but raised in front above his forehead by a silver button.
His step was firm and active: his eye quick and penetrating, and always in
a state of restless motion; and when he was talking he had a habit of
continually
drawing on and off his right glove, which he always wore to
preserve
the whiteness of his hands. The tones of his voice in ordinary
conversation
were even and manly and agreeable to the ear; but in the
excitement
of battle or in anger they were like the blast of a bugle!'
`I thank you, Don Julio, for your description of this fearful corsair,' said
Dona Elena, who had listened to the lieutenant with interest; and with an
expression of admiration at what she heard than of fear. Is it true that he
is so cruel as he has been represented?' she inquired.
`I have no question of it, senora. He has doubtless slain or commanded
to be slain, hundreds of unfortunate men. It is known that he has burned
captured vessels with all their crews and passengers!'
The cheek of the maiden blanched, and a shudder of horror passed over
her frame. Her attention was now drawn to her father, who was about to
proceed in a boat to the beach of white sand, a cable's length from the ship,
to explore a path up to the monastery, for the purpose of securing a retreat.
He had only delayed leaving the deck until the return on board of the boat
which had conveyed the fisherman across the basin. This was now close
along side, and all eyes were bent upon it as it rapidly advanced with the
pescador standing up in the stern. The boat had hardly struck the side
before
the active young Corsican had climbed up the lofty sides of the galleon
and stood upon her deck.
`Well, senor pescador?' demanded Don Ferdinand de Garcia in an
earnest
tone. `The news! What saw you?'
`A vessel, my lord, about a league and a half to the northward of the Nez
head.'
`What class was she?' demanded Capitan Baptista.
`A brig she seemed to be, senor!'
`Seemed? Do you not know a brig from any other vessel?'
`She was standing stern on so both of her masts ranged in one in the way
I saw her!'
`Standing on! It is a dead calm!'
`It is calm here, senor, but outside there is a fine four knot breeze. The
wind blew my cap from my head as I stood upon the top of the hill.'
This information was received in appalling silence. One of their hopes
in which they trusted had vanished.
`Was she visibly moving through the water?' demanded Capitan Baptista.
`As well as I could discern, senor.'
`And standing south?' asked Don Ferdinand.
`Yes, your excellency.'
`From what point is the wind?' inquired the captain, thoughtfully.
`From the north-west. The vessel has it nearly aft!'
`Did you see any other sail besides her?'
`No, senor capitan. As soon as I had discovered her and made the
signal
,
I doscended the hill to report to you.'
`You were right, pescador. Your excellency, I think there can be little
doubt that this is the pirate brig.'
`It is our duty to provide for our own defence and security, whether it be
or not, senor capitan. I will at once proceed in the boat to the foot of the
path and see where it leads. Dona Elena, I would rather you would
accompany
me; as in case the galleon should be attacked here as she lies, I wish
you to be in safety.'
`I do not fear, father, but these brave officers will defend the galleon,'
answered
the maiden.
`But their bravery cannot protect you from the shot. I would have you
on shore in the security which yonder overhanging monastery would seem
to afford. I can see some of the holy fathers looking down upon us from the
battlement over its cloisters.'
As Don Ferdinand assisted his daughter into the barge and followed
himself
,
the officer posted upon the top of the cliff suddenly electrified every
one by calling out in a loud voice`A brig is coming into sight to the
northward
!'
`You see, senor capitan,' said Don Ferdinand, we have no time to lose.'
And he pushed off from the ship and was pulled rapidly ashore.
`How far off is she?' shouted Capitan Baptista to his second lieutenant.
`About half a league to the north of the promontory, and about two
leagues distant from here!'
`Is it the corsair?'
`I think it is, senor! Can you send me up a spy-glass?'
A young cadet, slinging a telescope across his shoulders, lightly sprung
with it into the rigging, and in a few moments was standing upon the
summit
of the cliff. The officer took it from him, and while he levelled it at
the distant vessel all eyes were watching him and every ear intent to hear
his reply. Even Don Ferninand bade his boatmen to cease rowing until the
response was given.
`It is the pirate, senor!' he answered in a positive tone. `I can make out
her signal aloft, the red arm grasping a sabre on a white ground. Her black
flag is not flying or is hid by the spanker. But it is the same vessel that we
have been flying from. She has got a very short fore-mast with a top-mast
and topgallant-mast up above it! I can distinctly count her ports! She is
standing south about a mile from the land, and carrying all sail!'
`The saints carry her by without discovering us,' responded the Captain
with a look of anxiety and trouble. `Now my brave crew we see what is
before us if we happen to be found out. I am resolved to defend the ship
to the last. I know there is not a Spaniard on board that will not second
me! Do not shout! We must keep as still as we may be. I shall expect
you to obey my orders without question. There is no prospect of saving
any part of the bullion by sending it on shore. The time is too brief. I
must use every minute to place the galleon in a state of defence. We must
fight to the last, and when all is done, blow up the ship! She shall not
become
a prize to the freebooter!'
The brave captain now ordered his officer upon the rock to lie close so
as not to be discovered, and report every few moments the motions of the
brig in the offing. In the meanwhile he prepared to place his vessel in the
best condition of defence he possibly could, if the enemy should enter the
basin and attack him. Don Ferdinand, on reaching the white beach at the
foot of the precipitous cliff leaped on shore followed by Dona Elena.
`I will go up the path with you, senor,' she said, as he prepared to ascend
a broad crevice or cleft in the cliff which was worn with footsteps. Though
steep the way was by no means difficult, as in every few yards steps had
been cut into the rock by the monks. After a few minutes toil they reached
a level green spot where they came to a spring gushing from a solid block
of stone. By its side was chained an iron dipper. Here both drank freely
of the cool water, which tasted delightfully after being so long accustomed
to the flat and brackish water on shipboard. The breeze from the sea
reached
them here and refreshed them. There was yet a path still higher to
ascend
before they could reach the monastery. After glancing down into the
sileut calm basin, where lay the galleon almost beneath them, so that every
movement upon her decks was visible, they again commeneed their ascent,
and at length stood upon a broad platform of rock directly under the walls
of the monastery. Here they stopped to breathe and turned to look around
them. Far deeper than before below lay their ship moored against the
sheer precipice. On the rocky pinnacle above her masts they saw on a level
with themselves the young officer who was stationed on the lookout, and
from time to time could hear his report of the motions of the brig. The
vessel they also could now see themselves. She was now nearly abreast of
the basin and not more than a league distant.
`She is going past sir,' said Elena, clasping her hands earnestly together
as she watched the distant object of so much interest to all.
`I trust she will pass us, daughter, but I fear the worst. Doubtless this
coast, and all its sheltering places are well known to this bold corsair. I
have no confidence in our security. Now that I have discovered a means of
ascent, I shall return to the galleon, and on the first intimation that she
changes
her course towards the land, I shall have a hundred men at work
transferring
my own as well as the crown's gold to boats and conveyed up this
height. In one hour's time it can be all in safety in this convent.'
`The brig is surely standing on past, sir!' cried Dona Elena.
`She seems standing towards St. Ana certainly I will delay a moment
or two to watch her movements. While you are observing her I will rap at
the gate and acquaint the holy men here with our condition.'
While he spoke a postern opened within the greater gate of the seaward
wall of the convent, and a monk of large stature, aged about forty, and
attired
in the costume of the Benedictine order, came forth and approached
them.
`Benedicite, brother! benedicite, sister!' he said, elevating his hands in
the act of blessing them. `You are strangers and came from the ship
below
!'
`We are Spaniards father, and we gladly perceive by your tongue that
you are also of Spain. Our ship is a richly laden galleon from Mexico.
We have been driven past our port and through the straits by a storm, and
at the same time chased by a pirate who prevented us regaining our port.
We steered eastward, hoping to reach Genoa, but as in an action with him
yesterday we were somewhat disabled, we last night put in here hoping to
elude him, and trusting he would pass us by supposing we had steered for
St. Ana!'
`This then accounts for the unusual appearance of this large ship in our
bay, which few craft but fisher's visit. You are welcome brother to our
convent
.
Has your pursuer past?'
`He has just appeared in sight round yonder promontory, father. We left
him disabled yesterday many leagues to the north and west of this, and at
dark lost sight of him. But now we see he has repaired his injuries and is
again in chase. He seems to be passing by without suspecting our presence
here!'
`He is steering for the port of St. Ana,' said the monk looking steadily at
the brig. `It is possible he is ignorant of this inlet, as the fishermen tell
me its entrance is not visible to vessels passing. This is your daughter,
brother?' said the monk, gazing with a subdued yet admiring glance upon
the noble person and beautiful countenance of the Castilian maiden.
`It is father. She is the only child of the ancient house of De Garcia.'
`De Garcia is a noble lineage. Do I then address the Count de Garcia,
late Governor of New Spain?'
`I am Ferdinand de Garcia, father. I fear if yonder freebooter discovers
our hiding-place, I shall have to trespass upon your hospitality.'
`You are welcome, son. Our monastery, though one wing of it is
ruinous
,
is strong. Besides, this will be a sanctuary this sea-robber dare not
invade
,
even if he destroy thy vessel!'
`I fear me father he will have little respect for convent walls. He is an
English heretic. But if you have within your monastery secret vaults where
gold could be concealed even if the edifice were sacked, I should like to
place in them two millions of bullion, should this pirate discover this inlet
and seek us here.'
`There are chambers beneath the foundations that no human eye or skill
could detect,' said the monk with a sparkfing eye and in an earnest tone.
`They shall be at once opened and made ready for the reception of your
treasures!'
`Thanks, good father. I am more at ease that I know this. Now I will
watch from here the motions of our enemy. You have a vast and sublime
view from this eminence, father. What is the name of your religious house?'
`The monastery of San Elisco. It has been richly endowed but now we
are poor. Besides myself, who am the prior of the monastery, and four
brothers of humble degree, there are none of the order occupying it. Its
treasures have been loaned to different powers to prosecute wars against the
infidel and never repaid. We are very poor! Rich men do not bequeath
their wealth now as formerly to the church. A little of the gold that goes
to building up human vanity, would render this monastery once more
respectable
and influential. Once it numbered two hundred and fifty
brothers
,
and had a domain twelve leagues square with one thousand tenantry,
and an income of seventy thousand ducats. Now it has no lands but the
rock its foundation stands upon; but four brothers of the order who subsist
on charity, and but two or three peasant-retainers.'
`It is a great falling off, father,' answered Don Ferdinand, who seemed
however to answer mechanically, as if he was thinking more about the brig
than about the poverty of which the ambitious Benedictine complained.
The monk bit his lips, and then fixed his eyes stealthily upon the fair
countenance
of the maiden, who, with earnest eyes, her lips just parted and her
person bent forward in eager watchfulness she kept her gaze fastened upon
the slowly passing Corsair's ship.
The anxiety on board the galleon each moment increased and the officer
upon the rock had as much as he could manage to keep watch on the brig
and at the same time answer the numerous shouts of Capitan Baptista; who
but for his unwieldy weight would have gone himself up aloft and taken a
position upon the summit of the rock to observe with his own eyes her
movements.
`There can only be one way by which our presence here can be known
to him,' said Dona Elena, suddenly turning to address her father. As she
did so she met the eye of the monk full with her own, and starting she
blushed with confusion and surprise; for no woman could mistake the deep
gaze of admiration which he was regarding her.
`What way?' asked Don Ferdinand.
`Through the fishermen who have left the inlet. I see four or five out at
sea, and if the brig should question any of them we are betrayed!'
This is true indeed! We should have prevented any of them quitting the
inlet while we remained here. He is evidently steering for one now!'
`They are honest men and would not be likely to betray your presence to
pirates,' said the monk; who had with an effort recovered his
self-possession
,
which for a moment he had lost on so unexpectedly being detected by
the maiden gazing upon her.
`The fisherman flies. Look! She fires!' exclaimed Dona Elena,
turning
pale; and a cloud of smoke was seen to roll from the brig's bows, and
the next moment the dull report of a gun reached them.
`The boat has come to!' repeated Don Ferdinand in the same breath.
`The brig has hove to, senor capitan!' shouted a moment afterwards Don
Carlos from his rock down to the deck of the galleon.
The announcement created the utmost consternation, and a hundred eyes
were turned up towards him.
`She has hove to to speak a fishing boat!' I see it now under her stern!'
shouted the officer.
`Then the galleon is as good as blown up!' cried Capitan Baptista with
vexation. `I have feared that. I ought to have kept every fishing craft close
in the basin. Por San Diego! The game is up; and all we have got to do
is to stand at bay the best way we can!'
CHAPTER III.
The Fight.
The
brig had indeed hove to! From sailing steadily along at the rate of
five knots and standing on direct for Santa Ana, and while those who were
watching her with such intense interest, were about congratulating each
other upon her being well past their place of concealment, she all at once
came up into the wind, laid her main-topsail aback and became stationary.
We will transfer the reader on board of her, not at this moment however
when she heaves to, but about half an hour previous when first discovered
by the fisherman.
At this period she was standing towards the Nez Head under a crowd of
sail, and showed herself to be a brig of about two hundred and eighty tons,
rising very high out of the water, but without a poop-deck, being flush fore
and aft. Her masts were low and stunted, and the fore-mast was but
two-thirds
its proper height, being composed of two short spars fitted together;
so that in order that she might carry a foresail it had to be set close-reefed.
Her upper sails and spars were of the usual proportions. She was painted
black with a scarlet band running round her waist, and with red-lining to
her ports, which were raised, displaying eight large guns to a side. Her
yards were painted red and exceedingly square, giving her immense breadth
of canvass. Her bulwarks were the height of a man's head, and her
hammock
nettings were stowed like those of a man of war. She was
exceedingly
broad in the beam, and built very much after the model of the
Portuguese
slavers of that day, though her aspect was far more warlike. She had
a heavy appearance, with her stunted masts, high quarters and full bows, yet
sailed with case and rapidity, rising and falling to the long ground swell
with a graceful onward movement.
Upon her quarter deck stood two persons besides the man at the helm.
They were watching in silence the sunlight kindling the summits of the
mountains of the island, along which they were sailing. Amidships upon
the deck or upon gun-carriages lay two or three men asleep, who by their
dress were officers of the brig. Forward and between the guns were
grouped
a large number of dark looking men with visages marked by crime.
Some of them were smoking, others conversing, others were calmly asleep.
The wind moved the brig so steadily along that the services of no one on
board were called for save those of the helmsman.
The two persons upon the quarter-deck were very opposite in appearance
and aspect. One of them was a young man of three or four and twenty,
tall and well made with a clear blue eye, fair flowing hair, and a pleasant
expression about his finely chiseled mouth, united with a look of singular
decision and daring. He was smoking a cigar, and leaning over the high
carved quarter-railing that like a balustrade surrounded the quarter-decks
of vessels of that period. A light blue cap sat carelessly yet becomingly
upon his head; and he wore a loose, embroidered jacket of navy-blue, with
small clothes of black velvet adorned with gold buttons. His stockings
were of black silk, and in his shoes glittered buckles set with diamonds.
His air was at once free and bold and such as become one who, if not the
captain of the brig was at least on familiar terms with the individual who
was so.
This individual stood but a pace or two from him. He was a man of
middle
stature, firmly built and precisely answered to the description given of
the Corsair Kidd, by the young Spanish officer to Dona Elena; with this
difference, that he now wore a mustache instead of a sweeping beard; and
was dressed richly in black velvet. He wore a magnificent sword by his
side, the belt of which was set with precious stones. A single diamond of
great beauty and size blazed in the hilt. His sombrero was beneath his
arm, and he leaned upon his sheathed sword as he stood watching the land.
His fine, large head, with its massive mane of black locks that covered his
broad shoulders, appeared to the best effect as the sun fell upon his brow
and lighted it up, giving at the same time darkness and depth far more
intense
to the dark eyes that darted forth their penetrating glances beneath his
heavy brows. His appearance was singularly commanding, yet at the same
time terrible. If he but glanced at the helmsman, the man started and
shrunk from his observation, and when he looked forward the voices of his
men sunk into a whisper. Suddenly he threw his eagle eye aloft!
`Are you alert? What do you discover?' he called in a stern, deep-toned
voice to a man at the mast-head, and speaking in English.
`I see nothing in sight, sir!' answered the man; and as he answered he
fixed his gaze more earnestly on the sea ahead of the vessel.
`When we double this headland we shall be able to take a clear sweep of
the coast with the eye,' said the pirate captain glancing from the young man
who was standing near him towards the Nez Head.
`The Galleon has at least six hours advantage of us, captain,' replied his
lieutenant, and by this time is safely auchored in Port St. Ana.'
`If she passed that port she is now not more than ten leagues ahead of
us, for the most of the night there was no wind. With this breeze we shall
soon get round this headland and then be able to see for a long distance from
aloft. If she is not in sight there is no doubt she will have run into St. Ana.'
`And in that case?' asked the young man drily.
`I shall take her out!'
`Is there no fortress there?'
`Yesbut ill-manned, and with but half a dozen poor guns. I could
silence
it in five minutes, and for that matter take the town.'
`The galleon will be enough for once, if you get possession of her,
captain
,'
said he, smiling.
`Yes. She has given me too long a chase for me to think of letting her
off lightly. She must have at least a million of dollars on board in pure
silver! This is one of the heavily armed ships that are always selected for
the transportation of the treasures from the mines of Mexico to Spain.
What ho! aloft?'
`I see nothing, sir, but a fishing boat just coming out from under the land!'
answered the man.
`We must fall in with her! Helmsman, keep your eye on the boat and
steer so as to intercept it. We may learn something from him, my lord!'
`Yes,' responded the young man, coolly blowing the blue smoke from his
lips. They possibly may be able to give some information, if the galleon
passed so near the island as to be seen from the shore!'
`If she is not in sight when we round this headland, we shall find her in
St. Ana. The wind has been such that it is impossible she can have run
out of sight in the night, being full in view at sunset; and since then I know
we have made a better rate of sailing than she has done, judging from the
past progress of the chase!'
`This has been a long chase, captain!'
`Not so long as one I had three years ago in the southern ocean. I fell
in with a homeward bound Indiaman off Madras and gave chase to her. I
was then in a large ship heavily armed and well manued; the same as I
told you I after wards lost in the Brazils. The Indiaman sailed well, and as
the trades were blowing, we had a fair race for eleven days before I came
within gun-shot. To keep this distance I could see her every three or four
hours pitch a gun or two into the sea, or some heavy merchandise, till at
length she was as light as a lugger in ballast.'
2
`Did you eventually capture her?' asked the young man in a careless tone,
at the same time lighting a fresh cigar.
`No, my lord. I brought her at last within range, when a white squall
struck me and carried away my mizzen mast, which went over the side
taking
yards and sails. When it cleared away again the Indiaman was hull
down ahead, having carried every stitch of canvass in the gale to run away
from me. So I lost him, But this galleon I do not mean to lose in this
way. Ho! my glass here?' he cried with animation. At the command an
African, who, with his long arms and hideous visage, resembled an
ourangoutang
more than a man, spring up through the sky-light with it and placed
it in his hand. When he had done so he stepped behind his master and
folded his long apish hands upon his hairy breast with an air of the most
solemn gravity. His costume was as extraordinary as his personal
appearance
.
He wore a long scarlet cap, and scarlet breeches fringed with silver
thread. His black body was naked from his waist upward. A gold collar
band encircled his neck, on which was engraved the words
Cinqua
,
the property of
Kidd
.
His wrists were loaded with brass and silver bracelets, not unlike those worn
by the American Indians; and long gold rings depended from the lappets
of his long ears. About each naked ancle were half a dozen brass rings
highly polished; for most of Cinqua's leisure time was employed in
keeping
these and his other ornaments. He seemed to possess no other attribute
of intellect than cunning. His monkey-looking face expressed a singular
union of fear and malice.
The corsair placed the spy-glass to his eye, and levelled it in the direction
of the shore towards an eminence that rose beyond the promontory. After
a moment he exclaimed`There is meaning in that!'
`In what?' asked the other with interest.
`I saw what appeared to be a flag waving on yonder hill and sent for my
glass. It shows me a man upon the bill who, as I was looking, waved the
flag three times above his head and has now disappeared. This must be a
signal either to us, or to others! Take the glass, my lord! Do you see any
thing further?'
`Nothing. It is strange?'
`What news aloft?' called out the corsair eagerly.
`Nothing in sight, sir!'
`We are fast rounding the headland. In a few moments we shall see the
tower of St. Ana about eight miles distant!'
`I see it now, captain,' said the young man sweeping the range of view
with his glass. `We have just this moment opened it round the head of
the promontory!'
`I see it with my naked eye. Now in a few minutes we shall be able to
command the whole coast for miles beyond St. Ana, as well as that the
promontory has been concealing from us. I will aloft with my glass and
take a look into St. Ana! I discover from the deck the masts of two or
three vessels in the port!'
As he spoke the pirate captain threw himself into the rigging and was
soon standing in the main-topgallant cross-trees surveying the coast with
his glass.
`I can look distinctly into St. Ana. There is no large vessels there. I
discover
only a few small Italian polaccas and fishing boats! I have swept
the coast beyond and the sea on all sides but see nothing. I can discern the
blue summits of Tuscany but not a vessel lies in the range of my eyes in
any direction!'
`Perhaps she has run across to the Italian coast,' answered the young
man from the deck.
`There has been no wind to enable her to do this! She would have been
now visible if she had attempted it!'
After a second close observation of the sea and the coast both above and
below the port of St. Ana, the corsair descended to the deck. His face was
dark and gloomy with disappointment.
`What in your opinion has become of the galleon?' asked the young man.
`That she is lying hid in St. Ana, perhaps behind the fort, with her masts
housed to prevent their showing above the fort. It is clearly impossible she
could have got out sight by morning, when she was visible at sundown, and
since then we have had the same wind and the same chances she has had!
I shall run strait for St. Ana and search the port! How? That fisherman
is scudding from us landward?'
`There is another farther out, sir,' said the helmsman.
`I see him! Luff a little and get between him and the shore. These
fellows are usually out all night, and doubtless have seen the galleon if she
passed this way!'
The brig's course was changed a little to cut off the fisherman from the
shore, while the other boat was flying rapidly in towards the land, as if from
a suspicion of the dangerous character of the strange vessel. While the
brig was moving on along the land about two miles distant, Captain Kidd
was constantly busy with his glass, ranging both the shore line and the
horizon
seaward. He came abreast of the inlet into which the galleon had
gone, but without discovering the entrance, as the face of the cliff seemed
entirely unbroken. The town of St. Ana, with its turrets and harbor, was
now clearly visible, and having inspected it closely he said`I am satisfied
the galleon does not lie in there. The fort is so low upon the water that
her battlement would not conceal a ship of her size even with her topmasts
housed. It is my opinion she has run into some other harbor along the
coast! What are you watching so closely, my lord?'
`That fishing craft which run away at our approach. She this moment
disappeared as if she had gone into the very side of the cliff!!
`Then there is some opening there into which she has run,' cried the
consair
quickly. `But here we are nearly up with the fisherman and will soon
learn.'
`He has followed the example of his fellow,' said the young man,
laughing
,
as the fisherman hoisted his sail and began to scud.
`Throw a shot over him!' said the corsair to one of his officers in the
waist.
The man went forward, depressed and levelled one of the two guns and
fired. The ball was seen to strike the water not a hundred yards beyond
the fishing boat.
`There comes down his sail as quickly as it went up,' said Kidd, sternly.
In a few moments afterwards the brig had come up with the lugger, and
he was ordered to come alonside; but clumsily working his craft through
fright, the man fell to leeward, and Kidd ordered the brig to be hove to for
him to reach her. In a few minutes, the lugger, which contained two men
came alongside, and one of the fishermen was ordered on board the pirate.
`Does your boat belong in St. Ana?' demanded Kidd.
`Si, senor,' answered the man, taking off his blue woolen cap.'
`When did you leave the port?'
`At day break, senor.'
`Was there a Spanish galleon lying there?'
`No, senor.'
The man's reply was prompt enough, and the corsair believed him; but
there rose to the countenance of the fisherman afterwards, a peculiar
involuntary
expression which could not escape the penetrating eye of the pirate.
`You have
seen
this galleon,' he said sternly.
`No, senor,' answered the man, trembling.
`You know of her! I read it in your eye. Deceive or trifle with me at
your peril!' he said in a terrific voice, at the same time taking a pistol from
the rack round the main-mast.
`I will tell your worship all I know, if you will spare my life, and let me
and my poor boat go free?'
`I would not harm your miserable life, picaro. Speak! What is it you
know?'
`I told you truly I had not seen the galleon, senor. But a comrade of
mine, whom I met out on the water this morning, told me that a large
armed
ship had put into the Gancho Basin last night, and was lying hid in the
deep water behind the rocks!'
`This is great news, by the holy rood!' cried Kidd, his fierce eye lighting
up with a smile. `Now where is this Gancho basin, fellow?'
`It lieth in there away, your worship,' said the man pointing towards the
very spot where the young man had seen the fishing-craft so mysteriously
disappear.
`Do you mock me, fellow? I see nothing!'
`The entrance cannot be seen from here, senor. It can only be
discovered
when close to it. Inside is a deep basin, half a mile across, where the
largest ships can ride. The monastery you see on the height yonder, looks
right down into the basin.'
`And this ship you speak of lies therein?'
`So I am told, senor.'
`Do you know the passage?'
`Si, senor! It is very crooked. The Galleon could not have gone in
without a pilot!'
`Then remain you and be my pilot! Your comrade shall go adrift with
your lugger and come and get you in shore when I have done with you!'
The poor man beut his head in silence, and then by the command of the
pirate the brig being once more underweigh, stood by the helm and
directed
the steersman how to steer towards the rock. The brig instead of
running
free as before was now laid up to the wind and went dashing the spray
before her in the direction of the invisible entrance. An air of triumph
and revenge marked the dark visage of the corsair as he stood watching the
cliff and from time to time endeavoring to make out with his glass the
opening
towards which his vessel was rapidly advancing.
`Now is our success certain, Belfort! This can be no other than the chase!'
he said, addressing the young man who was passing thoughtfully up and
down the deck.
`Yes.'
`You are strangely dull, my lord! This is a time of triumph and mirth!
The galleon is ours!'
`I am not over and above cheerful this morning, captain,' said Belfort.
`Methinks you are changed since last we sailed together! Being three
years on shore has made a monk of you. Wella cruise or two with me
will make you as good as ever! Do you know, that falling in with you at
Gibraltar, I regarded one of the best fortunes that could befal me! I have
missed your courage and talents the last three years! You have done well
to spurn an idle life on shore and take to the sea once more!'
`I have no doubt I shall do better by and by,' he answered with a smile.
At the same moment, Kidd turned away to look for the entrance; and as he
did so the clear blue eyes of the young man rested for a brief space upon
his face with an expression of calm superiority and defiance. He instantly
banished it, however, for the careless look of indifference which he
previously
wore. It was very clear from this that there was only an outward
good-understanding between the two; that while with one the feeling of
companionship was cordial; with the other it was assumed! that the
consair
had an enemy in the man he trusted!
This young man had been a midshipman on board the very ship of war,
on the deck of which Kidd had first openly withdrawn allegiance to the
king and raised the free flag. He was one of the young officers whom he
had corrupted to his views by tales of chivalrous and romantic adventure
upon the high seas; tempting them with the idea of capturing ships laden
with the gold of Peru and Mexico, and making captive the beautiful
daughters
of the Indian emperors and princes, and establishing on some Island
Paradise of the western world an empire of pleasure, beauty and love!
To such tales did young Belfort listen; and, taken with the pictures of
luxury and wealth of the artful leader, nearly all the young officers joined
in annulling their allegiance to the British crown, and in hoisting the free
flag of the seas. Such was the origin of the first piratical act of the young
English officer, whose name, subsequently as the corsair Kidd, filled all
lands with its sanguinary fame. At first he had pursued in some measure
a course against which his followers felt no repugnance. He laid his ship
before some small towns and placed them under contributions, but without
using violence. But gradually as his lawlessness and love of wealth
increased
,
he did not hesitate to burn, pillage and slay where he met with
resistance
.
His force increased to several vessels, within two years, and over
each of these was placed an officer who had served under him. These
commanders
met with various reverses. Some deserted their chief and cruised
in distant seas on their own account, while others were taken and executed.
To Belfort the corsair had become attached, and always kept him with him
on board his own vessel as his next in command. This young man was noted
for his courage and daring, and also for his humanity, which presented a
singular contrast to the blood-thirsty spirit of his captain.
At length he became weary and disgusted with the exercises of this wild
career of war against mankind, and taking an opportunity he made known
his intentions to Kidd to leave the sea forever and dwell in England. After
some reluctance, Kidd acquiesced in his wishes, and they parted in London
on the most friendly terms. Belfort remained in England under an assumed
name, and in disguise visited his father who was a baronet and the son of
an earl. To him he made a full confession of his past life and his purpose
of becoming a man of honor; and this gentleman spent nearly two years in
vain exertions to get his son's pardon of the king; though without letting
his majesty know he was in England, but assuring him that he had left the
service of Kidd.
CHAPTER IV.
The Pirate's Lieutenant.
The
baronet at length died without effecting his object, and soon
afterwards
the death of an elder brother made Belfort heir to the carldom. He
learned that the estates were about to be confiscated and his title
extinguished
;
when he resolved to make a bold attempt to see the king and cast
himself
upon his mercy. He succeeded in getting an interview with his
majesty
and after an hour's audience, he left the royal presence successful! The
king had pardoned him, and authorised him to inherit his estates and title;
but upon a condition
which he was personally to fulfil! This condition he
made known to no one. Till it was successfully accomplished his audience
with the king was to be held secret. A day or two afterwards, he suddenly
left England for Gibraltar. His first enquiries on landing there were, if the
corsair Kidd was cruising, as was reported, in the neighborhood of the
straits. He ascertained that this was the fact; and to his surprise the very
next day he saw walking the streets of Gibraltar one of his men, whom he
well knew. Pretending still to be one of them he learned from him that
the corsair was lying not far up the coast, taking in water and provisions
and making repairs. The man led him to a boat at the quay, in which he
and several other pirates had come to the city; and with them Belfort
returned
to the vessel. He was received by Kidd with every demonstration
of joy, and at once told if he would remain with him, he should have
command
of the first ship he should capture.
`I mean to remain with you, captain, he said frankly; `I am tired of the
land. I suppose you know I have inherited a title, but the king publicly
declared
my estates confiscated and my title extinguished?'
`Yes. I saw the news in an English Gazette which I found on board a
merchantman I captured. I then said that I well knew it was with the hopes
of getting this title that you left me; and I added that you were ours again
now you had lost it, if I ever fell in with you again! You see I was right!'
`What are you now doing?' asked Belfort.
`I am watching for Spanish galleons! I have captured three the last
three months, but two of them had thrown overboard all their silver, for
which I made coffins of the hulls, and sent them down scuttled beneath the
sea with all on board!'
`You must be rich!'
`No. I handle a great deal of treasure, but there are so many rogues to
share it that it goes but little ways. Besides it takes a large sum to buy
diamonds
!'
`Are you still as fond of diamonds as ever?'
`Yes, quite so! It is the only wealth becoming a true gentleman! Gold
and silver are earth! See! Here is one I have had set in Paris lately. I
gave two hundred thousand silver pesos for it! Here is a brooch
containing
a diamond sun encircled by seven stars! It cost me the whole freight
of a Mexican galleon, and that was half a million. If I took a galleon
every
day it would be only a diamond a day more!'
`Your wealth in diamonds must be enormous, captain!'
`About five or six millions pounds sterling!'
`And do you carry them all with you?'
`Yes. In rings as you see, brooches, buckles, clasps, sword belts, &c. I
have most of them in a casket under my pillow!'
`I should think you would fear your men!'
`They do not value diamonds! They would rather have the baser visible
wealth of coins. I can keep my wealth without fear of being robbed of it
while I let the dogs roll in silver dollars. Here is a stone I took from the
finger of a Mexican lady,' he said, withdrawing his glove and exhibiting his
shapely fair hand covered with jewels! `It sparkles with a crimson light
and is very singular and valuable!'
`Well, I am glad to see you so prosperous, captain!' said Belfort.
`And you shall share equally with me. I need a friend and companion.
I have never been able to make up your loss to me. Your appearance on
board has made a new man of me!'
`Where do you cruise next?'
`I am expecting a fleet of galleons from Mexico, and hope to cut one of
them off. They will be near port in a few days. I shall sail tomorrow and
be on the lookout for them!'
`I accompany you,' said Belfort with animation, but `on one condition!'
`Name it,' said the pirate.
`That whether successful or not in capturing one of these silver freighted
galleons, you will visit the coast of England!'
`There are too many of the king's cruisers in the channel, and some of
them would be likely to make a trap for me. No, my good lord Belfort! I
have resolved if I do not fall in with any ship here to sail westward for the
West Indies and cruise in those waters, and so run down to New York and
Boston. There is always plenty of specie on board the King's vessels in
those seas!
The young noble reflected a few moments and then said cheerfully,
`Be it so, captain. I will go with you,' answered the young man,
impressively
.
`I swear here never to part from you so long as you have a deck
beneath your feet!'
Kidd grasped his hand warmly, and the compact was sealed by him over
a flask of wine which was drank in goblets of chased gold.
The next day the pirate vessel got underweigh, and the following day fell
in with the galleon, cut her off from her port and gave chase. This was
now the eighth day since this persevering chase had commenced. The
brig now kept her way rapidly and steadily towards the cliff, and when
within a third of a mile, just as Kidd began to suspect his new pilot
intended
to wreck him upon the iron rocks, the opening was visible like a narrow
cleft in the precipice. Each instant it enlarged, and in a little while they
saw widen before them a passage broad enough for three or four ships to
enter. Beyond reposed a dark, still basin shut in by the sides of the
descending
mountains. The corsair had leaped into the rigging on first
discovering
the passage, and stood there watching the opening of the basin
with a keen and triumphant glance.
In the meanwhile, the movements of the pirate-vessel had been closely
watched by all those so deeply interested in the safety of the Galleon. Don
Ferdinand, on seeing her tack after speaking the fisherman and stand
directly
for the inlet, had hastened to the water-side, while Carlos from his
rock at the same time communicated the startling intelligense to the deck
of the ship. As Don Ferdinand reached it he found every thing in a state
of determined defence.
`It is madness fo attempt to fight him off, Capitan Baptista,' cried the
ex-Governor
.
`He will surely board you sword in hand. With your permission
I will land as much of the bullion as can be set on shore. The head of the
monastery tells me he has secret vaults where it will be safe, should the
pirates
even go so far as to take possession of that edifice.'
`I can spare my men till the corsair enters the basin, when I shall want
them,' answered Captain Baptista, with decision.' `I must defend my
vessel
at all odds!'
The crew were immediately employed in discharging the boxes, kegs and
ox-hide sacks of gold and silver into the boats alongside; and as each was
loaded it pulled for the foot of the pathway leading to the monastery. Here
the men landed with the treasures, and began, heavily loaded, to totter up
the ascent. At the summit they were received by the padre, and passing by
Dona Elena who was watching the pirate's approach, were conducted by
him to the chapel of the convent, where they deposited the bullion upon the
paved floor of the chancel. As the corsair's brig was full four miles distant
when he tacked, Don Ferdinand, by great exertions, had succeeded in
removing
to the shore not only all his own boxes of treasure, but a million
of dollars belonging to the crown. About half a million yet remained to be
placed in the boats, when the upper sails of the brig were seen glancing
above the rocky arms of the outer entrance to the basin, and within half a
mile of them. She was standing in boldly with her coursers only drawn up,
carrying every other sail. She evidently had a pilot, as she followed the
intricacies
of the channel with accuracy and boldness. On seeing her the
Spanish capitan gave orders for his men to leave the money and fly to their
guns while the drum beat to quarters. Don Ferdinand who was on board,
although he would gladly have been by his daughter's side, whom he beheld
looking down from the rock on which the monastery stood, still was too
brave a man to leave the ship at such a crisis. He therefore stationed
himself
by the captain to give his advice and aid in emergency; not a little
relieved
to reflect that his child would be in safety during the approaching
combat.
The corsair came steadily in until she had passed the wall of rocks over
which her upper sails had been seen, when she appeared full in view of the
galleon from truck to deck within long musket shot distance.
`Call on them to surrender, captain, before we attack; it will save
bloodshed
,'
said Belfort, as they came in sight of her close under the cliff.
`They are snugly hid away there, by the holy rood!' said the corsair with
a grim smile as his eye took in her position. `Fisherman, you have earned
your weight in gold! You shall be rewarded! Ha! They are prepared
for our reception! Do you see, Belfort! every man is at his gun and
matchlocks
are alight. The tops and rocks above are crowded with musketeers!
and see! on yonder crag is perched an artillery piece! This is not looking
like wishing to surrender!'
`Still demand it!'
`Well, I will do so to gratify you, Belfort.' The pirate as he spoke sprung
upon a gun and placed the trumpet to his mouth. His vessel had now
fairly
entered the basin and lay becalmed on its glassy waters about two
hundred
fathom abreast of the Spanish ship, all of her men at the guns.
`Ho! the galleon!'
`Ahoy!' answered Capitan Baptista.
`Surrender, or I will sink you in five minutes!'
The corsair waited an instant for a reply. The Spanish capitan waved
his sword to his decks, and instantly the very rocks reeled with the roar of
his guns as he discharged his broadside. Kidd sprung to the deck of his
vessel amid the crashing of spars, with a visage like that of an enraged lion,
and in a voice of thunder called upon his men to pour in their fire in return!
For a few moments the heavens were filled with the roar of cannon. The
cliff and mountain-sides echoing and re-echoing the heavy artillery,
redoubled
the sounds of the battle. The vast clouds of sulphurous smoke,
without
wind to bear it away, settled heavily upon the surface of the water, and
concealed the hulls of the combating vessels from the sight of Dona Elena
and those who looked down from the monastery. The voice of the corsair
reached their ears above the thunder of broadsides and the crash of
musketry
.
Carlos upon the rock was busily working his six-ponnder, and
sending
destruction at every discharge upon the decks of the brig.
`This game will soon sink us!' cried Kidd, as grim with powder he
approached
Belfort, who stood upon the quarter-deck trying to look through
the smoke at the enemy. `The rudder is shot away, and shot has entered
under the water-line. We must board! There goes the main-topmast by the
board! Ho, boats and boarders!' he cried in a loud voice. `Leave your
guns and crowd the boats! We must carry her cutlass in hand!'
Amid the terrific fire kept up by the galleon, four boats were filled with
men and put off for the enemy amid the dense smoke. In the leading boat
was the corsair; and in the next Belfort sword in hand.
`What means this sudden silence on board the pirate?' asked Don
Ferdinand
,
turning towards the Capitan Baptista. `They have ceased firing!'
`Then I have sunk them or silenced them. But this smoke makes every
thing as invisible as the darkest midnight! 'Tis strange! Do they think
they have done us damage enough?'
`Had we not better stop firing to see what this means?'
`Yes!' and he gave orders accordingly. But he had scarcely done so
when the dash of oars was heard close at hand, and, one after another, four
boats filled with pirates shot out of the smoke and struck the sides of the
galleon. Before the Spaniards could seize their weapons to repel them,
they had clambered on board and attacked them forward and aft. After a
short and ineffectual resistance the crew of the galleon were driven
overboard
into the water. Captain Baptista and Don Ferdinand defended the
quarter deck with great bravery; but were both slain, although Belfort made
every effort to save them from the savage vengeance of the pirates. Julio
was the last slain as he attempted to defend the entrance of the cabin against
Kidd, the corsair shooting him through the head with a pistol. In less than
five minutes after boarding the galleon the pirates had her in their
possession
.
The smoke gradually lifted and floated off from the vessel, when the
pirate-brig
was seen in the position in which she had been left and nearly in
a sinking condition, with her masts shot away and her hull completely
riddled
with shot. Kidd instantly ordered a boat to go on board, into which
he sprung and pulled for her. He boarded her and descending into the
cabin
in a few moments returned with a casket of jewels. The brig was
settling
fast. On her deck were strewn the dead and maimed, while others
less severely wounded, piteously begged to be taken from her. The pirate
had no ear of pity. He gave stern orders to pull back to the galleon, taking
his slave Cinqua with him. As he reached it his brig gave a surge forward
and heeling over, plunged heavily beneath the surface into the depths of
the dark basin, leaving ringing in the ears of the pirate, the wailing shriek
with which their wounded comrades filled the air as they were engulphed
in the closing waters.
`So that this ship is sound let her rest in peace,' said the corsair, as the
topmast spar of his vessel disappeared from his sight. `Now we must see
to securing our prize and providing for our own safety!'
He had scarcely spoken when the report of a cannon was followed by a
six pound shot, splintering the deck. He recollected the gun which had
done him so much mischief in the action, and looking up beheld Carlos and
three or four men loading it for another fire. There was a new enemy and
from an unexpected quarter! Unless he could be dislodged the ship could
not be held, for the gun, about two hundred feet above her, had the
complete
command of her decks. Kidd stood a moment irresolute! He then
cried,`A thousand
pesos
to the man that captures that gun!'
Twenty of the pirates sprung into the rigging to reach the rock from the
yards. The gun was discharged as eight of them were upon the fore-yard
together, and the yard came down, shot from its slings, hurling the pirates
to the deck. Others, more successful, reached the rock and began to
ascend
it, sabre in hand. Carlos and his men were without weapons. The
pirates reached the summit and grappled with them. Two of the
combatants
,
losing their footing, fell headlong to the deck mangled corpses. Two
more were plunged down the face of the rock. Each of the remaining
Spaniards clenched a pirate and sprung with him into the sea. Carlos
remained
alone, standing proudly upon his gun. He had singly hurled three
of his assailants over the precipice. A sharp report came from the deck of
the galleon and the blood spurted from his brow. He fell over dead upon
his gun, clinging to it and clasping it in his dying embrace!
The corsair having satisfied himself that the galleon was sound in her
hull, and not materially injured in her spars, and having discovered a large
amount of specie on board, he resolved to repair her with all speed and put
to sea. To this end he at once proceeded to give orders. His first command
was to tow her out of the inlet to the entrance where she could be under
the influence of the breeze. Here he anchored her about a hundred
fathom
from the shore and prepared to fit her for sea. She was safely moored
in her new ground about half an hour after he had taken possession of her;
and by night he expected to be able to put to sea.
The engagement and its result had been witnessed by Dona Elena from
her position in front of the monastery; and it was with feelings of the
deepest
anguish she reflected, that while she stood in safety her father was in
the midst of the scene of carnage and death upon which she gazed. The
roar of the cannon appalled her soul, and she breathed prayer on prayer
for his safety. The monks also knelt around her and prayed for the success
of the Spaniard against the heretical buccaneer. When she saw that the
galleon was at length in the hands of the pirates, and that her crew were
driven overboard, she could not be restrained by the entreaties of the monks,
but rushed towards the shore. When she reached the landing several of
the crew of the galleon had landed; but of none of them could she obtain
any intelligence of him.
`We left him fighting hand to hand with the pirate chief,' said one.
`And, craven, why did ye fly and leave him in danger?'
`We fled for our lives, lady! The pirates had possession of the deck.
They surprised us!!
At length a wounded man with difficulty attained the shore.
`What news of my father?' she cried.
`He is dead, lady. I saw him struck downboth he and Capitan
Baptista
!'
The bereaved daughter uttered a piercing cry and fell insensible upon
the beach. The Spanish sailors bore her in their arms up to the monastery
gate along the path by which they had formerly conveyed the gold and
silver
,
and placed her in charge of the prior. His eyes sparkled when he was
told that the wealthy Spaniard who owned half the treasure which had been
carried into the monastery had perished; but he opened not his lips.
Sending
one of his order for the wife of a vine-dresser, whose cot was near the
wall of the monastery, he gave her into her charge with direction to use
suitable
means to restore her to consciousness.
In the meanwhile the preparations for fitting the captured galleon for sea
went rapidly forward; and by sunset of this eventful day she was in
condition
to sail. Her new master, as he stood on the quarter deck, surveyed her
with a practiced eye and a look of stern satisfaction.
`I have gained by the change, Belfort,' he said, complacently. `This
vessel
is newer than mine and will sail, as I have experienced, quite as well.
She will also aid me in capturing others of her species. I could run into a
fleet of these heavy bullion-freighted Spaniards now without suspicion. I
think I shall carry the Spanish flag, and set my own only on emergencies!'
Belfort said something indistinctly in reply, and then the corsair gave
orders
to weigh the anchor, every thing being ready.
`Where now shall we sail?' asked Belfort.
`Into the Atlantic.'
`Dare you put in at Gibraltar?'
`I am bold enough; but I would rather not,' he answered, laughing. `I
have I find near a million of dollars on board, taking into account those
jewels
found in that female wardrobe below!'
`I wonder what female was on board,' said Belfort with interest. `She
was evidently of rank!'
`No doubt. If I had taken a single prisoner I might have learned all.
But my men's blood was up and no soul was spared except those who swam
to land Doubtless the lady was previously taken ashore!'
`Perhaps so. I should regret it if she had perished!'
`She certainly was not seen by any one when we boarded. If she had
sprung overboard she must have been seen!'
`Not in the thick smoke and confusion,' answered Belfort, sadly.
`Well, she is in heaven then and I have her jewels,' answered the corsair
with an unfeeling laugh.
The eyes of the young man flashed, and he muttered to himself as he
turned away from him, `Thy time will come ere long!'
CHAPTER V.
The Prior.
The
sailing of the galleon, now become a corsair's ship, was watched
from the monastery with no little interest by at least one person This was
the prior, padre Eustaquio. He was standing in the eastern window of the
corridor which overlooked the sea-board. At the first intimation that the
pirates were getting underweigh a cloud of anxiety and mistrust that
enveloped
his features disappeared, and a cold exulting smile lighted up his
proud austere countenance, like moon-beams breaking through wintry
clouds. Something of Father Eustaquio's character has already been
hinted
at. He belonged to that class of ambitious ecclesiastics, at that day more
numerous and powerful than at present, who would see the church rich in
this world's goods as well as in spiritual. He mourned over the degeneracy
and heretical tendency of the age, which withheld from the coffers of the
mother church, the rich donations, which, in former ages princes and nobles,
the great and the small, used piously to pour into them. Now, few were
the bequests to the church. Her priories, convents and religious
establishments
were falling into ruin, while many of those which remained were
shorn of their domains. Few monasteries could maintain a full brotherhood
of well-kept monks without parting piece-meal with the estates which gave
them dignity and power.
San Eliseo, the priory of father Eustaquio, was at one time one of the
most powerful houses of the order of Benedictine monks. But it had
gradually
fallen until now it existed only nominally; father Eustaquio and four
poor brothers of the order alone dwelling in it and saving it from total ruin
and desecration. The prior did not cease daily to lament the poverty of his
priory, and in his sermons which he from time to time preached from city
to city, he did not fail to denounce with
anathema
those false sons of the
church who died without making her bequests; but his efforts to build up
San Eliseo were but illy-rewarded; for he returned to his priory seldom with
a heavier
saca
than he went forth with. Father Eustaquio belonged also to
one of the oldest families of Corsica, originally from Spain, and his pride of
descent was not a little involved in his desire to preside over a religious
establishment
of wealth and influence. San Eliseo, it is true, afforded him a
quiet abode and leisure for books, to which he was greatly attached, and in
the study of which his time passed without interruption and in comparative
quiet. Perhaps, but for the arrival of the galleon, his peace would never
have been disturbed by any re-awakening of ecclesiastical ambition.
The movements of the galleon, after she had hauled out of the inlet and
anchored, up to the time of her departing at the close of the day, had been
nervously watched by the prior. There was evidently, from his excited and
restless manner some deep subject upon his thoughts. At length when he
saw the galleon fling broad her canvass to the evening breeze and slowly
and majestically stand off from the land, his dark gray eye lighted up with
pleasure and satisfaction. He watched her as she steered northwardly
doubling
the promontory of La Nez and then tack to pass round the northern
end of the island. He did not leave the window until the shades of night
gathering over the sea rendered her finally invisible.
`Heaven be thanked!' ejaculated the prior, as he turned from the window
when he could no longer see her`Heaven be thanked! She has gone
and the saints keep her away henceforward!'
`Amen!' fervently said a deep voice close at hand. The prior looked
round with a frown and saw in the gloom of the chapel one of the monks
standing by him.
`What are you doing here, brother?' he demanded, sternly.
`I came to remind your reverence that the vesper bell is still tolling.'
`Ah, I had forgotten my duty. You did well to remind me. I was here
watching the pirate's departure. You heard me pray, Anselmo, that she
might never return?'
`Yes, your reverence, and I again respond `
Amen!
'
`Anselmo. There are some of the crew of the galleon saved! How
many reached the shore?'
`Seventeen common sailors.'
`You gave them food and have provided lodging for them?'
`Yes, your reverence.'
`Tomorrow morning the lugger from Santa Ana, which I despatched the
fisherman Piedro for, will be here to take them to Genoa, which is the
nighest
port where they will be likely to find a Spanish vessel. Have you
assembled
them in the chapel to return thanks for their escape from this
pirate
?'
`They are there with the brethren, awaiting your presence!'
`And this maiden?' inquired the prior in a lower tone and with a slight
degree of confusion. `Does she still sleep?'
`Mancha, the vine-dresser's wife, says she has not waked since noon!'
`It is favorable. The medicine I administered after she revived from her
swoon was a soothing narcotic. She is comfortably lodged?'
`As well as she can be, your reverence, in such a place,' answered the
monk.
`I would gladly admit her into the monastery; but the rules of our order
strictly forbid that a woman should cross its threshold!'
`Yes, your reverence. I remember in Spain the queen desired to visit
our monastery of San Pablo, and did so in spite of the remonstrances of
the prior. But after she had left it, the door by which she had entered was
walled up, and the pavement wherever her foot had trod was taken up and
relaid!'
`Anselmo!'
`Your reverence!'
`I can trust you?'
`I am the servant of your reverence,' answered Anselmo, who was a
short, fat, oily monk, with a cheerful aspect and an habitual look of awe
towards
his superior.
`Not now! By and by! The vesper hour is passed and I must to the
chancel!'
The ensuing morning a small lugger, called by the Corsicans a `Lozana,'
of about forty tons, latteen rigged, entered the inlet of El Gancho, and
dropped anchor near the foot of the path leading up to the monastery.
Already
grouped upon the white beach were the Spanish sailors. The monks
and father Eustaquio stood among them.
`Now, my children, fare thee well,' said the prior, lifting up his hands.
`Kneel around me while I give thee my benediction!'
The seamen knelt in a half circle around; the brethren of the order also
kneeled behind their superior, and then in a firm, loud voice, the prior gave
them his blessing. When they had risen to their feet he said
`Come hither each of you and kiss my hand, children. I have provided
at my expense a safe and commodious vessel for you to depart in for
Genoa
,
where you will doubtless find some ship of your own country. I wish
you a prosperous voyage. With regard to the specie which has been
entrusted
to the convent,' added father Eustaquio, avoiding the eyes of the
men, `I would enjoin upon you religious silence; lest hearing of its being
here, some lawless freebooter may visit the island and carry it off by force
before I can send word to his most Catholic Majesty that it is here, which I
shall do the earliest convenience. Now depart, my children, with my
blessing
!'
The seamen then, each in turn, reverently kissed the hand of the prior,
and embarked for the Lozana in a small boat, which travelled thrice
between
it and the shore before it took them all on board. The little vessel
then hoisted her triangular sails, and favored by a fair though a light wind
moved out from the shore, and soon afterwards entered upon the open sea,
steering her course towards the Tuscany coast. The monks re-ascended to
their monastery; but the prior lingered on the terrace of rocks by the gate
to watch the receding lugger with perhaps no less interest in her departure
than he had felt in that of the galleon. He did not turn from the rock until
he saw her like a spec upon the horizon. When he did so his face wore a
peculiar expression of satisfaction.
`They have gone too! The pirates first departed, as I believe, ignorant
of the treasure conveyed here; and now the only witnesses of it have
departed
also! What guilty ambitious views are taking such strong hold
upon
my soul? What dark and daring thoughts have seized my senses? I
fear to examine myself! I fear to know what I feel! I tremble to ask
myself
what I mean? This is a strange event that has occurred! A million
and a half of gold and silver in bullion and coin in the vaults of the convent
and those who deposited it here have perished! A portion, I was told by
Don Ferdinand belonged to the crown, but a half a million in the boxes and
hide-sacks, marked F DE G. were his own. Yes, he brought his own
wealth on shore first! then as much of the king's as he could before the
corsair came upon them! He is now dead! the king's captain is dead!
the men who deposited it here are dead or departed! Shall I look upon this
as an act of Providence for the good of the monastery! Shall not God rob
kings for his church?'
The ambitious prior walked up and down the terrace in deep thought!
He had evidently yet formed no plan. That he had been assaulted by the
temptation and given ear to it, to appropriate, if possible, the treasures in
his vaults to enriching his monastery was evident! The temptation had
taken
hold upon him with the firm grasp of avarice. Yet how should he do
this thing in safety! How could he appropriate the King of Spain's
treasures
!
Their fate would sooner or later be known! Some of the seamen
would reach Spain, and would necessarily mention it in describing the loss
of the galleon. This difficulty seemed insurmountable.
`No. I cannot take the king's money!
That
I must deliver up! It is
clear that it will be claimed. Therefore to stand well with his majesty I
will not delay sending him word. I will do it promptly by despatching a
lugger! My promptness and zeal will doubtless be rewarded by the king.
I shall at least gain something! This step shall be taken without delay!'
The prior again renewed his thoughtful walk up and down the terrace.
A subject of deep and powerful interest was evidently agitating his mind.
His brow contracted and grew dark. His lips were compressed with
energy
,
or moving with muttered expressions.
`The father has perished! She alone lives!
She is in my power!
The
secret of
his
treasure may be kept! Ah!
I have it!
Heaven, I thank thee
for the thought!
It is mine!
The treasure is the church's! Happy thought!
At one strokeat a single glance of the mind I have done it!'
The shade cleared up from his brow! His head was elevated! His eye
beamed with a smile of success, and his step became buoyant and firm!
An air of decision sat upon his features and took the place of his previous
anxiety and agitation. He looked like a man who has determined upon an
evil step and has boldness to pursue it.
He lingered an instant to scrutinize the horizon in the direction which
the lugger had taken, and then, instead of entering the gate of the
monastery
as he was first about to do, he passed rapidly around the walls to
the south side of the vast pile, and approached a hamlet composed of half
a dozen of vine-dressers and goat-herds huts, which were built on a
sort of street under the walls. He directed his steps towards one of these
abodes, shaded by a fig-tree, and sheltered by an angle of the southern
tower
It was a neat peasant's cottage with a thatched roof and a rude portico
before the low entrance. As the prior approached the humble habitation
his step faltered, and a few paces off he stopped to get perfect command of
the expression of his countenance; then with a dignified religious air that
became his noble figure, he entered the open door of the cot.
`Benedicite, sister!' he said as a poor woman came from an inner
apartment
on hearing his step.
`Good morning, your reverence,' she humbly answered, dropping on one
knee and crossing herself. `You have come to see how the poor lady
does.'
`Yes, Mancha,' answered the prior gravely. `She is a daughter of the
church in affliction and needs our care.'
She is better, your reverence, this morning. Last night, after she had
waked up and remembered all that had happened she wept for three hours
mourning her father and then fell asleep. She seems more easy this
morning
and has eaten something. Will your reverence walk in and see her.
She is dressed, for I told her you would no doubt call to talk with her.'
Father Eustaquio followed her into a low ceiled chamber, where seated
in a cane chair, with her face leaning upon her hand sat the lovely orphan,
her face pale with silent grief. On the entrance of the monk she lifted her
large tearful eyes towards his face, and a slight color chased the pallor from
her cheek.
`You are kind, reverend father to visit me!' she said with a grace of
manner
of which that affliction could not rob her. `I am just able to realise the
full extent of my misfortune! I fear to enquirebut has my father's body
been found?'
`It has not, sister. Several of the bodies have been heaved upon the
beach, and will be interred to day with the services of the church. Search
shall be made for that of Senor de Garcia!'
`Thanks, your reverence,' she answered with grateful warmth.
`I trust you are better, senora?'
`I am less overcome than at first, I should feel more resigned to know
that my father had Christian sepulture. It is fearful to think of his lying
unburied beneath the sea!'
`Every means shall be taken to recover his body, lady. In the meanwhile
I would look to your comfort. You are aware that the rules of our order
do not permit females to enter within the walls of our establishments.
Mancha! you may retire,' he said, turning to the woman. `Now that we
are alone, senora, I will invite you to share the hospitalities of the
monastery
until you can obtain passage for Spain. The hut is not suitable for the
accommodation of a person of your rank, and also it is unsafe for you to
remain here; for there are ladrones upon the shore as well as upon the sea.
There is one wing which has not been used for some time, and is not now by
the order, which I will prepare for you. There you can remain secluded
until a vessel arrives from Spain to remove the specie belonging to the
crown. You shall be surrounded with every comfort and have a woman to
wait upon you.'
Dona Elena thanked the prior who seemed so kindly interested in her
welfare and said, `I have no alternative but to intrude upon your hospitality,
reverend father, until I can leave in a vessel for Spain. I possess as you
know wealth. I pray you to hire for me from the adjoining port a vessel to
transport me and my father's treasure to the nearest port of Spain!'
`There is no vessel, lady, lying in that port which could safely make the
voyage with your specie. I will, tomorrow, despatch one to inform the
king of the treasure here in my possession, and also of your presence here.
Doubtless before many daysa month at farthestsome vessel will be
despatched
hither to receive you and the bullion!'
`Till then I will be your guest,' said Dona Elena.
The Prior then took his leave.
Towards evening of the same day the Castillian maiden, escorted by the
prior and followed by Mancha, who was to be her attendant, entered the wing
appropriated to her accommodation, until she should be able to leave the
island
.
Here Dona Elena found every comfort suitable to her sex and
condition
,
though without any luxuries. Books were at her command, and she
had the privilege of walking upon the terrace over the corridor, which
commanded
a wide horizon. Here she would turn her gaze towards Spain,
and pray for some friendly vessel to visit the island. In the meanwhile, the
prior had despatched a small lugger to the nearest Spanish port, with a let
ter, to be forwarded by a courier to the king. It was as follows:
Dated at San Elisco, (
Corsica
)
June
28, 1700.
Most-Noble and Powerful Catholic Prince,
Emperor and Lord!
It is my painful duty to communicate to your Highness, the loss, by
capture
,
in our bay of El Gancho on the morning of the 25th instant, of Your
Majesty's Galleon `La Reina Isabel.' This ship was driven into the
Mediterranean
by an adverse gale and afterwards prevented by a corsair from
regaining her port, being chased until she run for shelter, three nights ago
into our secluded bay. Here she was attacked and defended with great
courage, so that she sunk the corsair's vessel, who boarded the Galleon in
boats, and after a hard fight succeeded in capturing her. Among the slain
were the captain with all his officers, and El Escelentissimo Senor Don
Ferdinand de Garcia, who with his daughter were passengers. Previous to
the attack, Don Ferdinand removed for safe keeping to our priory, one
million
of specie belonging to your majesty, which I hold in trust at your
majesty's
command. He left on board the galleon half a million which there
was not time to remove, which fell into the hands of the corsair Kidd, who
has possessed himself of the captured vessel and, after repairing her, sailed
from the island in her, doubtless bent on further deeds of rapine.
I further inform your highness that Don Ferdinand landed half a million
in specie, belonging to himself, which I have also in the priory vaults. His
daughter, who was fortunately landed before the attack is now here under
our protection, and will take measures for the transportation to Spain of
herself
and of her father's wealth.
Your most Sacred Majesty's very humble servant, who kisses the royal
feet and hands yf your majesty.
Eustaquio
,
Prior
.
We now return to the galleon for the present, and follow new adventures.
The fourth day after leaving the island she encountered a heavy tempest,
which compelled her, after battling with it a night and a day to put into
the Infidel port of Algiers for shelter. It so happened that at this time there
existed between England and the Dey a good understanding, and the
English
ships, by paying a yearly tribute, were suffered to trade with the country
without obstruction. The Dey had a high respect for the English nation,
not only on account of their strength and valor, but for the riches their
commerce
poured into his lap. This state of feeling was well known to the
corsair, who had made himself familiar with all the peculiarities
appertaining
to every part of the globe. Finding himself compelled by the storm to
run into Algiers, he run up the English flag at the peak, resolved to assume
the character of an English ship. He came boldly to anchor under the
guns of the castle of the Dey, where he rode out the gale; and the next
morning the storm having subsided, he went on shore to pay a visit to his
his highness.
The Dey received him in great state and with gorgeous displays of his
magnificence and power. His Highness was seated upon a throne of
ivory
,
at the upper extremity of a lofty Hall surrounded by mirrors. It was
the great audience chamber. The floor was covered with Persian mats
representing battle scenes; the most costly canopy of gold with hangings of
tapestry surrounded the throne; the ceiling was adorned with exquisite
paintings of flowers in gold and blue, and was supported by columns of
beautiful
verde antico
. On the right of the throne a step lower than the seat
oceupied by the Dey, was a burnished chair in which was seated the Sultan
Mother; and on his left upon a pile of gorgeous carpets reclining upon a
cushion covered with the soft gold feathers of the
olange
was the beautiful
daughter of the Dey, the Princess Xerifa! Around her knelt a group of
female slaves, and behind the throne stood a score of tall Moors, in green
urbans and holding naked scimetars in their hands.
On either side of the passage to the throne were lines of soldiers drawn
up, and outside of the hall, in the paved court, were squadrons of gorgeous
cavalry superbly armed and costumed.
Through the midst of this imposing array of military power and regal
magnificence, the corsair and Belfort passed to be presented to the Dey.
Both were richly attired and were in character with the scene of splendor.
Knowing the customs of the country, Kidd knelt and kissed the ground at
the feet of the Dey, and then rising bowed his head low to the Sultan
Mother
,
while with his eyes as well as his person he did homage to the beautiful
Princess. Belfort went through the same ceremony with equal
self-possession
;
and as his glance noted the wonderful beauty of the Princess, he
could scarcely suffer himself to withdraw it.
`You are welcome noble captain of England,' said his Highness,
graciously
speaking in Spanish. `We hail your presence here in our port as a
further
seal of the good feeling which exists between our court and that of
your king. But we in a special manner welcome you here; for we shall
need your service and that of your ship!'
`My ship and myself are both at the service of your Highness,' answered
the corsair readily.
`You shall not serve me without recompense, Sir Englishman! After you
have been refreshed by the collation which awaits you, I will open to you
the business for which I desire yeur service!'
Thus speaking the Dey rose from his throne, and commanding them to
follow him, retired into an inner apartment, where a sumptuous feast was
spread for their entertainment.
CHAPTER VI.
The Prince of the Desert.
The banquet given by the Dey Mahommed Ali, to the supposed English
captain, was a scene magnificence. The colored light streaming through the
painted windows; the sounds of invisible music, floating through the lofty hall;
the gorgeous colours of the dresses of the guests; the hues of the carpets
that covered the marble floor; the glowing tints of tapestry; the slender
columns supporting the roof, wreathed with silver veins bearing flowers of
pearls and rubies, all seemed like a creation of enchantment. The table
was covered with dishes of gold, siver and crystal, and the air was
perfumed
with the sweetest fragrance from vases of burning incense. The
Ethiopean
slaves in crimson turbans, green jackets trimmed with gold,
snow-white
Turkish trowsers and scarlet slippers, were moving over the yielding
carpets without noise, waiting upon the guests. In gilded cages hung
above the pointed Morisco windows, were innumerable singing birds whose
warbling mingled with the unseen music floated through the room.
Cushions
of gorgeous crimson satin or velvet, embroidered with flowers or stars
of gold and silver, were placed for each person; and beside their dishes
were napkins of the whitest Abysinian wool, embroidered with silver and
fringed with richly coloured threads.
As the feast commenced, a slave placed before each guest a vase of
rose-water in which to lave his fingers, for no forks or knives were used at
this repast. The Dey was seated at the head of the board, with the corsair
upon his right hand and the embassador of the Bashaw of Tunis on his left.
Next to the corsair sat Belfort. The other guests to the number of thirty,
consisted of the officers of the Dey's court and army. No females were
present; the ladies having retired to their own apartments on leaving the
hall of audience. The Dey having elevated his hands and cried aloud,
`Alla is great,' the slaves proceeded to serve the banquet. There were
exquisite dishes made of flour, honey and oil;
kaimac
, a delicious
preperation
of cream thickened with almondes;
moalibe
, a transparent jelly eaten
with powdered sugar and rose-water; and
keboabs
, without which no
Moslem
meal is perfect. There were also spiced dishes of meats rolled in vine
leaves; and dolmas a preparation of plums and cream made into cakes and
eaten with honey and spices. There were also the more substantial dishes
of dried beef, fowls, lamb and soups of exquisite flavors, with numerous
other oriental dishes, not omitting the pilauf, coloured scarlet with tomato
juice and flavored with nightingales. Then came grapes and figs,
pomegranates
and golden melons. The meal proceeded in grave silence as
became
the dignity of Eastern manners. Fragrant coffee and cool sherbets
3
followed the more substantial repast, and while these were being drunk,
pipes were brought in studded with diamonds and adorned with chains of
silver, and presented to each guest, with vases of rose water to bathe their
hands. While they were smoking a troop of beautiful daneing girls
entered
and began to perform before them the graceful and voluptuous dances
of the East.
`
Taib! taib!
good! good!' cried the Dey, as two of the most beautiful of
the dancers ended a very difficult and elegant shawl-dance. `By the beard
of the prophet you shall be rewarded!' and he cast towards them a chain of
pearls, which broke at their feet scattering the jewels over the crimson
carpet
.
`What think you of the dances of our court, sir Englishman?'
`They excel those of all lands I have ever visited, most noble Effendi,'
answered the Corsair.
`Those two slaves are a present from my brother the Pacha of Tunis.
Tuleiman,' he cried addressing the Tunisian Embassador; `I am well
pleased with thy gift. I would have thee tell his excellency, the Pacha thy
master, I am content with his present. Mashallah! they please me!'
And the Dey, who was a noble looking man, with a magnificent brown
beard, stroked his beard and looked contented.
`Almad my master,' answered the embassador gravely stroking his own
black beard in his turn, `shall be told what my ears have heard. He will
be content!' And having spoken, he majestically bowed his turbaned head
to the earth before the Dey and then resumed his silver tubed pipe.
`
Chok chai!
you have spoken well!' answered the Dey. `What sayest
thou, Frangist,' he said turning to the crosair; `would thy king accept from
me these young Zibales?'
`My king would not refuse a gift from your Highness. But in his court
each courtier dances for himself!'
`
Mash-allah!
that is wonderful!' ejaculated the Dey.
He then smoked a few minutes is silence, and giving a signal with a
gentle wave of his hand, the guests all rose and began to retire.
`Follow me, Frangist Effendi,' said the Dey addressing the corsair and
turning towards a door which his slaves had thrown open on one side of
the banquet hall. `Follow me and alse the young Aga thy friend with thee.
I have business to talk of with thee before my Divan!'
The pirate followed the Dey into a saloon less in size than the banquet
hall, but adorned with greater elegance and splendor. On three sides were
ranged
daii
covered with pink silk, sprinkled with silver stars. The fourth
side was open to the air and looking into a beautiful court or garden in which
was a fountain. The white buildings of the city and the slender minerets
of the mosques were seen above the rich foliage, and beyond was visible
the blue sea, with the fortresses at the entrance of the harbor, and the
corsair's
galleon riding at anchor with the English colors flying at her main.
Curtains and tapestry adorned three side of the saloon, on which were
represented combats of horsemen upon the desert and battles between the
Algerine caiques and the ships of Frangistan or Christendom. Mohammed
Ali seated himself upon the central and most elevated dais beneath a
canopy
.
By his direction the two strangers were seated near him upon
gorgeous
carpets placed for the purpose. On the left sat the stately Tunisian
embassador, and on the right were the three officers of the Deywho
constituted
his Divan or cabinet. The pipes of these several personages having
then replenished and vases of rose water, with goblets of iced sherbet
placed on little silver trays before each one by slaves who then retired.
The Dey then opened the business he had with the crosair, preparatory to
entering upon which he had thus magnificently entertained him.
`Know, noble captain Effendi of Frangistan that I have a fair daughter
the light of my eyes, the flower of my heart! She is called Xerifa, or the
lotus-blossom; and as thou hast seen her unveiled with thine eyes, I need
not speak of her beauty to thee. The Pacha of Tunis, my friend, having
heard of the beauty of Xerifa has sent to me to ask her hand in marriage.
Ne-bilirim? what should I say to his request? He is my friend. He is
powerful and rich. We have been at war and are now at peace. He
wishes
by these nuptials to seal our friendship.'
Here the Dey was silent and began to smoke his chibouque with some
energy.
`What reply gave your Highness to this request of the Pacha?' asked
the corsair.
`What shall I say to my lord's question? Mashallah! I bade my
daughter
prepare to accompany the embassador to Tunis and be the bride of the
mighty Almad Pacha of Tunis. El bilirim! what could I say more!'
`And the lovely Xerifa gave her consent?' asked the corsair.
`We ask not the full blown flower if we shall pluck it! I asked her not.
She obeys when I command!'
`When does she accompany the embassador?' asked the corsair, who
had already in imagination captured the Tunisian bark.
`That is what I would speak of,' said the Dey with more decision in his
manner. `Three weeks ago the embassador reached my court in a fair ship
for the purpose of conveying back my daughter to Tunis. Unfortunately
the vessel took fire five nights ago and burned to the water's edge. I have
no suitable vessel in my port, all my captains being at sea prosecuting my
war against the Emperor of Morocco. Your ship has arrived in port
therefore
at a time when you can serve me with profit to myself, as well as
strengthening the friendly interests that exist between me and your royal
master of the Island, whose friendship I feel proud to cultivate; he having
paid me always the yearly tribute I enjoined upon him, of one armed ship
and one hundred packages of cloth.'
Having thus spoken, the Dey struck two of his fingers sharply into his
palm making a ringing sound, when his chibouque-bearer entered, and
kneeling before him, received from his hand his costly pipe of rose-wood
wreathed with silver and tipped with amber. At the same time his cafeghee
appeared bearing upon a silver waiter minute cups of porcelain filled with
fragrant mocha. These were handed to each one present, after first
presenting
an elegant fillagree stand upon which to hold the cup.
`Noble and Mighty Effendi,' said the corsair, after the slaves had retired,
`if I can serve you I and my ship at your command!'
`Taib! good! You shall have for taking my daughter and her bridal
treasure to Tunisthe voyage is shorta thousand golden sequins and the
two dancing slaves, the Pacha has sent me. You have seen them with your
own eyes!' Are you content?'
`I am content, Effendi,' answered the corsair, concealing his satisfaction
under a countenance of great composure. Belfort raised his eyes and
rested
them upon the face of the pirate with an expression of dissatisfaction
and dlspleasure.
`Bring hither the Zibales and let the Frangist behold them again and take
them away with him!' he said, calling a slave.
In a few moments the two dancers entered, not in their former gossamer
costume, but veiled.
`Unveil!' commanded the Dey as they stood before him.
They obeyed. Thep were girls of not more than seventeen years of age,
with `gorgeous Georgian figures,' superb and voluptuous, with eyes large
and expressive, deep-souled and flashing, and with dark hair flowing to their
feet. The corsair, though little given to passion for the sex, could not view
them without admiration. Belfort surveyed them with compassion, for he
knew and deeply felt how degraded was the destiny to which they were
doomed, whether as the dancers of the seraglio or the slaves of the pirate.
`What would you do with these poor
almes
*
*
Dancing Girls
.
?' asked Belfort aside. `Let
them remain, and if you are wise, refuse to give your ship to this use. I
have your promise that if I sailed with you, you would seek the West Indies
or the American coast. Let us at once seil thither!'
`The promise of Kidd is sacred,' said the pirate haughtily though not
unkindly. `I will take this Princess to Tunis, and then my lord Belfort, I
will sail with you whither you will! A thousand sequins in gold is not
money to be thrown away! I accept these slaves for his Highness to
dispose
of at Gibraltar to some of the young Hidalgos!' added the corsair with
a smile. `Harems I am told are becoming quite the mode among the
Castillian
nobles. These beautiful Zibales will bring me a thousand pesos. I
look at these things, you see, with a merchant's eye, my good lord!'
Belfort made no remark; and as the Dey seemed to regard mistrustfully
the conversation in language which he did not understand, Belfort said,
`Your Highness, is this Pacha of Tunis young and of good person that
your daughter, the princess, will not repent her submission to your
commands
?'
`Bashasta! he has forty-five years over his head and hath a sear across
his cheek. He never need look into a mirror! Praise be to Allah, she is
as good as she is fair, Frangist,' answered the Dey, sipping his fragrant
coffee.' Are the Frangi woman lovely, Effendi!'
`They are very fair and are intelligent companions!'
`Companions? Alhemdulillah! Allah be praised! We have not such
sensible women in Algiers! Your women too walk in the public places
with their faces bare and speak with other men than their husbands, and
eat at the same table with them! Ajaib chai! It is a wonder!'
`Haif! haif! Shame, sname!' repeated the Dey's ministers looking
scandalised
.
`On my soul be it! I would have the head of a woman that would appear
in the streets of my city with her face naked!' said the Dey with great
positiveness
.
It was settled before the Divan broke up that the Princess Xerifa should
the next day embark on board the galleon for Tunis in company with the
embassador who had come for her and with two atteudants, besides a very
large amount of jewels and gold as her bridal treasures. The corsair and
his lieutenant then departed for their ship, the Dey placing upon the hand
of Belfort a superb diamond in token of his friendship, and throwing around
the neck of the pirate a necklace of rubies.
You look upon me with ill-looks, Belfort,' said Kidd, after they had
pulled
a few moments silently towards their vessel. `I love you and can put
up with some moodiness and wayward conduct; but by the mass! if I have
offended you I would like you to tell me of it.'
`I have no control over yon, I well know,' answered Belfort. `But I wish
to express my disapprobation of this affair you are about entering upon! It
is not your intention that the princess shall aver see Tunis. Your love of
gold is excited by her treasures and you covet their possession!'
`Well?' repeated the corsair as if he waited for him to proceed.
`I will not join in any treachery which brings ruin upon this lovely
princess
!'
This was spoken firmly.
The massive brow of the corsair darkened as a mountain precipice
darkens
under the shadow of a passing cloud. He drew his embroidered glove
on and off several times in rapid succession, bit his lip and let the fire flash
and sparkle in his dark angry eyes. But the storm passed. His face
become
composed and a smile took the place of the frown.
`You are young and chivalrous, Belfort. Your three years on shore have
changed you. I see you are less yourself every day. But I have a sincere
regard for you. You have more than once saved my life in former days and
often gave me good council. I would gladly oblige you by refusing to take
the princess. But my word is pledged to the Dey. I could not refuse. If
he suspected I was other than I assume to beif he discovered my true
character, these enormous, gaping sixty pounders, under the muzzles of
which I am anchored, would blow us into the air. The Dey allows no
corsairing
but what is done by his own ships!'
`But you pledged yourself to me when I came on board of your brig at
Gibraltar, that if I proceeded with you in chase of the Galleon you would
then cruise in the West Indies!'
`So I did. But we were forced in here by a storm. The trip to Tunis
will occupy but a week, and then I am at your service. I cannot get off
from my engagement with the Bashaw without arousing his suspicions and
displeasure, He may detain me and try to compel me, which might lead to
a discovery; as I am here completely in his power!'
`Will you promise not to harm the princess?'
The pirate was silent a moment, and then replied frankly, and with a
smile,`I give you my promise. But why do you particularly desire me
to keep steadily on towards the West Indies? The whole sea is ours! If
we gain wealth here why not remain awhile?'
`I have a desire to visit Jamaica. We were there once you emember. I
have friends there!'
`Ah, some inamorata you would see again! Well I will indulge you. In
this affair of the princess I must be indulged also.'
He spoke with a determination of tone that showed Belfort he could not
safely urge the matter further; and in a few moments afterwards they
reached
the galleon.
The day drew to a close, and the low-breathing sea breezes of a fair
summer's
evening were stirring the tops of the palms and just rippling the
waters
of the bay. In an apartment opening into the gardens of the harem of
the Dey's palace sat the gentle Xerifa. Tears stood in her deep eyes and
sighs at intervals stole from her bosom. There was a luxurious beauty in
the hour and the scene around her, but her pulse throbbed not to its
influence
.
Before her, like an emerald lake, waved the surface of a deep grove,
and gardens descended terrace below terrace to the sea. Birds gorgeously
winged, with breasts of gold and purple, sported in the branches of the
trees, and from fountains of the purest marble shot upward silvery jets
brightly into the sunlight, to fall back in a continual shower upon
water-loving
blossoms that crept over the basin. The fragrant breath of a thousand
flowers filled the odorous air, and around her, suspended in prisons of
exquisite
workmanship, were bul-buls and Arabian nightingales, whose
ceaseless
songs made the groves and saloons ring with melody.
But the betrothed princess was insensible to all this enchantment. Her
open palm was laid upon her fair brow in sad thought. Upon a cushion not
far from her, knelt one of the Georgian
almes
, whom the Dey had
presented
to the corsair, and which the latter on leaving him had desired should
remain in attendance on the princess. Her hands were crossed upon her
bosom, and her eyes were full of gentle sympathy.
`I grieve to see you so sad, Effendamy beautiful mistress,' said the
slave in a voice that was music. `You have cast aside your jeweled taslec,
and your costly mirror is neglected. Your bracelets are unclasped and fallen
at your feet, and you have crushed the flowers I gathered for you without
knowing that you received them. Can I do any thing, lady, to soothe your
grief? I am thinemy heart is thine! Shall I sing or shall I tell thee a
story of love!'
The princess raised her dark tearful eyes, and fixed them on her for a moment
with a half-uneonscious look; then surveying her face with interest, she
said,`Come hither, fair Georgian! Your words are gentle, and they have
touched a chord in my soul. What is thy name?'
`Ilda!'
`You have not been my attendant before. Where is thy sister?'
`She sleeps. She is fatigued. She is also sad, for she would serve you,
and fears her Frangist lord!'
`And do you not fear him, Ilda?'
`No Effenda,' answered the beautiful slave with sparkling eyes. `I fear
nothing. If danger comes it is but a moment's flight to paradise!'
`Wonld you take your life, Georgian?'
`If I was unhappy!' answered the
alme
flrmly. `I can never be unhappy,
for I feel that I can in an instant be happy! So I let nothing trouble me,
Effenda!'
`But death is fearful!'
`It is not so tearful as fear!'
`I am unhappy, Ilda, yet I would not die!'
`You are not a slave, Effenda. Slaves may
die
when they will! Why is
my noble mistress unhappy?' asked the Georgian with interest.
`Can I trust you, Ilda?'
`Nay, if a princess, who is commanded to marry a husband she has not
seen, is unhappy on the eve of her bridal, the secret is not difficult to guess,'
said she, archly.
`You are a daughter of the Eblis for divining,' said the princess with a
smile. `I will confide in you, Ilda,' said Xerifa in a low tone, after looking
cautiously around.
`I will be true my noble lady!' answered the beautiful Georgian, looking
up from her cushion with attentive and faithful eyes.
`Know then, Ilda, that my heart is another's. The noble and youthful
Prince of the Desert, Haroun-Almad has won my heart. I have met him but
thrice. The first time was last spring, when I was journeying in the
caravan
from this city to Haroum. We were attacked by a party of mounted
Saharicks, and our escort cut to pieces. The robbers penetrated to the
centre of the caravan, and the horse upon which I was mounted was seized
by their chief, and I was borne like the wind a captive toward the
mountains
.
It was some minutes in the melee before my father knew that I was
absent, when he gathered as many of his dispersed soldiers together as he
could and pursued. My captor and his party had nearly reached the
mountains
,
when a party of richly attired horsemen, led by a youth of noble
presence, crossing the plain, challenged the robbers to stand. A severe
battle took place, the Saharicks were defeated, and I was rescued by the
victorious young chief in person. When he learned what had occurred,
and that I was the daughter of the Dey, he at once escorted me back, and
meeting with my father surrendered me to him without ransom!'
`He was indeed a noble youth,' said the Georgian, who very properly
looked upon this generosity as a peculiar evidence of Oriental
magnanimity
.
`From that time I never ceased to think of him for a day; nor did he of
me, as he afterwards told me.'
`Then you saw him afterwards!' exclaimed Ilda.
`Yes,' answered the princess, blushing. `A month afterwards, he visited
the court and solicited my band in marriage!'
`Oh that was so charming and good in him!'
`But my father would not consent, because the prince ruled over only
desert tribes, and had no large sea-port cities and navies. He called him a
Bedouin Robber, and bade him leave his court. He, however, found an
opportunity
to see me, for somehow or other he knew that he was not
indifferent
to me; and he tried to urge me to fly to the desert with him and be
his bride. I believe I should have conseuted, had not our interview been
discovered, and he himself taken and bound by a party of the Turkooman
palace guard; we having been betrayed by the slave that we trusted.'
`A scimetar should have taken off her head,' said the Georgian with
flashing eyes.
`He was a eunuch. The prince slew him upon the spot for his
treachery
.
That night a party of the prince's horsemen entered the city,
attacked
the prison and rescued him.'
`And did you see him a third time?'
`Only the night before this hateful Tunisian ambassador's arrival! It was
in this very garden! He was disguised as an Ethiopian slave! He then
told me that he would come for me on the eve of the Reza, when my
father
would be at the mosque with all the retinue of the palace. He would
come with two fleet horses for himself and me, and a thousand of his
warriors
would ride into the city with him and surround the palace till I had
mounted, when they would escort me in safety to the desert!'
`How full of romance!' exclaimed the Georgian; `and the Eve of Reza
is three days from this, and tomorrow you must be given up to the
Tunisian
embassador for his master. And old and ill-visaged he is, my princess!
Alas! that the Prince of the Desert were not here tonight!'
`Alas, indeed,' sighed Xerifa. `I have tried to find a way of conveying
news to him of my situation, but there is not one in the palace I can trust.'
And tears filled her eyes.
The slave looked very thoughtful a moment.
`It is too late now,' she said, shaking her head sadly.
At this moment both were startled by the appearance of a person coming
from behind a covert of a pomegranate tree that grew so near as to reach
its scarlet fruit into the saloon.
CHAPTER VII.
The Captive.
This
person was a young man of fair skin and blue eyes, and wore the
costume peculiar to the white slaves, captured from christian vessels which
the Dey at that time held in bondage. It was a close-fitted scarlet cap,
and a coarse green jacket with blue cotton trowsers. A chain extended
between his left ancle and wrist with sufficient play to enable him to perform
labor. This person had been captured in a French ship, though his native
land was the British Colony of Massachusetts. He had been in bondage
for more than a year and being taken in a vessel of France had been
treated
as one of that country; for the Dey then held no Englishman in
bondage
.
The young American was employed as a gardner in the palace
garden
,
and from his patient and faithful performance of his task had been
recently
promoted to be a sort of overseer of the other slaves in the garden.
The arrival of the English ship, as he supposed it to be, inspired him
with the idea of escape; and he tried ineffectually to make known his
bondage
to Belfort or the corsair, but he could not attract their attention; and
he had too often witnessed the free use of the Dey's scimeter on the necks
of his fellows to risk discovery of his wishes by too much boldness. After
the departure of the officers to their vessel, he watched it with eager eyes;
and as he pursued his work in the garden in sight of it, he busied his
thoughts upon some plan of escape. But the walls were high, and guards
were stationed on the outside, and instant death he felt would be his portion
if his attempt proved unsuccessful.
At length as he was pruning a pomegranite tree near the saloon in which
the princess was wont to sit at twilight, a eunuch entered, and, according to
custom called in a loud voice upon all the slaves to retire from the garden
into the Sultan's grounds as the princess was about to make her appearance.
The tree he was pruning concealed him from the eunuch as he passed; but
he was about to follow him and obey, when an idea suddenly flashed upon
his mind, that, as the eunuch had not seen him he might remain where he
was concealed until night and then take advantage of the darkness to pass
through the saloon when the princess should retire from it and so along the
private galleries of the harem, to a terrace from which he knew he could
let himself down into an ohscure street that ran beneath the wall.
He therefore crouched closer under the dark foliage of the
pomegranate-tree
,
while the eunnch having driven forth the other prisoners, locked the
gates and repassed him with the keys without suspecting his presence.
The young American was well aware that discovery would be the signal
for his instant execution; but liberty was sweet enough to risk life to gain
it; and although he did not know but that each moment he might be
missed
and searched for, he still resolved to keep hid, though as the princess
had not yet come in, he might still have called to the eunuch and been let
forth in safety. In a few moments the princess Xerifa attended by
the beautiful
alme
Ilda entered the saloon of the Golden-cages, as it was
called
,
and then passed into the gardens to walk. He saw that her countenance
was sad; and his heart sympathised with sorrows of which he knew not the
cause; for she had always been kind towards him and often sent him, by
a slave, iced sherbet when she saw him working in the heat of the day.
After
she had walked a few minutes in the gardens she retired to the dais of
the open saloon where we have seen her seated relating her story of love to
the listening Georgian.
The young American was so situated in his covert that he did not fail to
hear every word that she uttered, for the language of the Moors had become
familiar to his ear. He became deeply interested in her fate, and wished
in his heart that it was in his power to aid her. If he had been free and
could have mounted a fleet horse he would not have hesitated to have
spurred
to the desert with the intelligence she wished could reach the
youthful
prince. He wished more than ever that he was free, in order that he
might save her. But he was a slave in chains, and each moment in peril of
his head.
`At any rate I can assure the princess of my sympathy and desire to serve
her, and perhaps she may aid in my escape!' he said to himself. `If I can
show myself without creating alarm, I will tell her I will serve her all in my
power!'
With this determination he waited for a favorable moment and, after
first rustling the leaves of the pomegranate and then throwing a blossom
upon the floor of the soloon, he emerged himself from his concealment full
in sight, and not seven feet distant from them.
The princess was about to fly, when throwing himself upon his kness
where he stood, he made an impressive and eloquent gesture to detain her.
`Stay noble princess!' he cried earnestly, `do not give the alarm! I am
your friend! I have heard the story of your love and would serve you!
Trust in me and I swear by your Allah I will not betray you!'
Xerifa heard and arrested her flight, at the same time instinctively placing
her hand upon the mouth of the Georgian, who was about to cry out for
assistance
.
The princess had at once recognized the young gardener, and
his words awakened she knew not what hopes in her bosom.
`Fly, rash Frangist! what do you here? would you perish by the sabres
of the eunuchs?'
`I regard not life, lady, if I may aid you in your distresses. I have
listened
to your story and feel for you. But I am a slave. These chains render
me incapable of serving you. Assist me in gaining my liberty, and the first
fruits of that liberty I will consecrate to you and your cause!'
`Hda,' said the princess in a low, earnest tone, and with a glowing cheek;
`secure the door well, that no one may enter. Speak softly, christian! I
have heard thee. I have a regard for thee. I believe thou art kind and
generous and brave! Why hast thou lingered here? you will perish!'
`I remained hid when the eunuch entered, in the hope of regaining my
liberty by leaving the gardens in the darkness of the night, and so escape to
the English ship. It was while thus concealed I overheard unwittingly
your story. I at once resolved to make known my presence to you, noble
princess, and offer my services in return for my liberty!'
The princess listened with attention. The ingenuous face of the young
man, bore testimony of his sincerity. She was silent and thoughtful.
`Trust him, sweet mistress,' said the Georgian. `I know he will not
deceive
you.'
`But how can we aid thy escape, noble christian youth?' she asked.
`By leaving the outer doors of the harem open.'
`And how will your freedom aid me or free me from the fate which
awaits me on the morrow? How can you rescue me from the bonds of the
Dey of Tunis? It is too late for you with the fleetest horse, to reach the
desert which is a hundred leagues to the Southward, to call the Prince to
my rescue.'
`True lady, but there is a way to save you from the destiny that you
dread, which has occurred to me. Englishmen are gallant and humane.
If I could see this English captain, and make known to him your story, he
would not hesitate to land you between this and Tunis, where you coul
reach your lover! Nay, once free I could find a trusty messengera faith
ful Moor whose life I saved, who would at once take horse and gallop to
the desert without drawing rein, and inform the Prince at what point on
the coast he would receive you from the English ship.'
`I have no faith in this English captain,' said the Georgian. `If the
younger Frangist were the captain, then could the princess trust him.'
`I can but try, your Highness,' answered the young man.
`I will trust you,' replied the princess. `I will aid you in your escape.
`You will then do all you can to serve me?'
`I will give my life, even, to your cause,' he answered firmly.
`Remain in your concealment until after dark. Ilda will then bring you
a disguise which will enable you to pass, if seen in your way out, as one of the
soldiers of the palace. You will find the door of the Eastern corridor
unfastened
.
Allah be with you, generous Frangist, and grant you success!'
added the princess taking leave of him.
About an hour after dark the Georgian stealthily entered the saloon, and
placing a large hundle on the ground near the pomegranate, tree hastily
retired
without a word. The young American habited himself in the costume
which was that of a Turkooman soldier! with a file contained in the
package
,
he freed himself from his chains and then softly crossed the saloon to
the door which he found ajar. After carefully looking around, and
seeing
and hearing no one, he passed into the corridor of the harema part
of the palace in which to have been discovered would have been death even
to one of the soldiers. At the extremity of this passage in which burned a
solitary silver lamp, fed with aromatic oil, was a sort of rotunda called the
Court of Mirrors. It was of an octagonal shape with a star of mirrors
imbedded
in each pannel, and the whole lighted from an invisible source; but
from the myriad reflections of this single light, the place was as light as if
the morning sun shone into it. This was the anti-room of the harem, and
the common drawing room of the wives of the Dey. It was necessary to
cross this lighted rotunda to gain the passage which led toward the outer
wall of the palace. As this place was in the very heart of the harem the
young prisoner's situation was one of eminent peril; and each step would
increase
it until he had passed the whole range of the apartments of the seraglio.
Taking courage he crossed rapidly this lighted space, and sought the door
leading to the passage on the opposite side. But as the doors were all alike
and very numerous, in his confusion he did not take the right one, but
entered
instead of the gallery, a chamber softly lighted by silver urns of
burning
aroma. To his surprise he found that he was in one of the luxurious
sleeping apartments of the seraglio. Upon couches of silk, reclined three
or four lovely Circassian slaves. A glance showed him that they were in
deep sleep. They hand soft olive complexions and very long black
eye-lashes
,
with dark long hair flowing over their snowy arms and ivory shoulders.
Their dresses were rich in material, yet simple as became the costume for
night. Around the apartment were strewn robes of the most magnificent
description beyond all that can be imagined. Jewels lay about the
apartment
in profusion. The raven tresses of one were powdered with gold
dust, among which were negligently strewn inumerable small diamonds,
as if carelessly scattered upon her flowing locks. She wore a jacket of the
richest azure velvet and trowsers of the finest muslin. Her costume was
that of the day-time, and from her appearance and attitude she seemed to
have fallen asleep reading a Persian tale, which lay upon the carpet against
one of her jewel-be-spangled feet.
Filled with apprehensions for his safety, the young prisoner hastily
retreated
and approached another door which was ajar. He hesitated. But
to linger was to undergo a greater risk than to advance. He threw it softly
open and entered a broad paved passage. In it upon the pavement,
wrapped
in their green kaftanji, lay reposing several sentinels, their sabres by
their side, while beyond he saw the gates which led from the Dey's gardens
into the harem. He cautiously retreated from this dangerous passage
without
having disturbed the black guardians of the harem, and with his heart
in his mouth paused on the ouside, after noiselessly turning the key upon
them, to deliberate what to do. He had never been in the harem before,
but he had heard it described by the slaves, and he had even once seen and
carefully studied a plan of the palace and seraglio which he had once seen
in the hall of audience. He therefore knew the direction of the passage
into
which he had intruded. He now surveyed the remaining doors and well
considered their situation in reference to the other parts of the palace, and
at length concluded to advance to one which he believed must lead in the
direction he desired to go; for as there were many doors, one to each of
the eight sides of the rotunda, and all precisely alike, it was no easy matter
to judge correctly between them. The door he next ventured to open led
into the corridor from which came a cool wind, by which he was assured
he was right. He closed it after him and traversed the corridor until he
came to a large quadrangle or court-yard surrounded by towers and high
walls. On one side were green-houses filled with plants and on the
opposite
side was an immense number of cages containing birds; this being
the aviary of the palace. At the end of the court he came to a heavy, gloomy
gateway which led into the Dey's stables. Upon the ground beneath the
arch lay several slaves fast asleep. He passed on without disturbing them,
at each step in danger of his life, and leaving the gates on his left hand, he
entered a side passage, vaulted and paved with rough marble. At the
farther
end he came to a gilded iron gate which he found unlocked with the
massive key in the wards; and he knew by this that the princess had been
before him to open his way according to her promise. The gate led upon
a terrace which by steps descended into a lower garden ornrmented by
parterres
of flowers, the walls of which were covered with vines. He was now
out of the palace. The stars shone down upon him, and the sea breezes
fanned his brow. Before him was the harbor and the sea, but too indistinct
to enable him distinguish objects.
He had still danger to encoueter; for a wall was to be passed before he
could gain the exterior of the seraglio grounds. He rapidly descended the
marble flight leading from the terrace into the parterres, and then
followed
a walk to its extremity where was a summer house in the shape of a
miniature
kiosk
. He entered this with caution. A black eunuch was
sleeping
upon the carpets within, and under his head was a sabre. He saw that
it was necessary to step over him, to reach a little wicket in the back side,
which would let him out of the range of the seraglio grounds, and which
the princess had promised to have unlocked. The ennuch was the
keeper
of this private postern.
The young American paused a moment. There was no time for long
deliberation. The slave would no doubt be waked by the opening of the
door, when discovery would lead to arrest. He bent over the Ethiopean and
suddenly seized his sabre from beneath his head and placed a hand upon
his throat.
`Speak and you are the next instant slain!' he said to him; `come with
me!'
The slave rose to his feet and suffered the soldier as he supposed him to
be, to lead him forth from the gate. The young man then locked it on the
outside and taking the key into his possession, he bound and left the eunuch
on the ground, and the next moment was flying down the steep street
which led from the rear of the Dey's palace towards the waterside. He
reached it in safety, for at that hour none were abroad. The galleon lay at
anchor not a quarter of a mile from the quay. Avoiding the guard
stationed
on this spot, he followed the shore a little distance, until he found a
fisher's
bazal
and jumping into it he shot out from the land towards the ship,
and favored by the darkness reached the galleon unseen from the shore.
Belfort was leaning over the quarter smoking a cigar, he having taken the
watch, and thinking upon some plan to prevent mischief happening to the
princess without bringing suspicion upon himself and his purposes, when
he discovered a small boat containing a single person close under the
counter
of the vessel. Knowing a few words of the Algerine tongue, he
challenged
it, when he was answered in English, greatly to his surprise,
`I am an English Subject escaped from bondage among the Infidels. I
pray you receive me on board!'
`As gladly as you will be to get on board,' answered Belfort in a
cheerful
,
prompt tone. `Pull along side.'
The young American the next moment stood upon the galleon's deck,
and was received by Belfort with a warm grasp of the hand.
`Welcome from captivity! I thought the Dey held no Englishman in
bondage
.'
`I am a colonist under the crown, belonging to Boston; and being
wrecked
at sea was taken off the wreck by a French ship which was captured by
an Algerine corsair; and ever since I have been in bondage with these
Infidels
!'
`How have you succeeded in making your escape?'
`By the aid of the lovely princess Xerifa!'
`The same who is to take passage in the ship to-morrow for Tunis?'
`The same. I was a gardener in the Dey's palace, and to-night,
overhearing
her lament that she was destined to become the bride of the Dey
of Tunis, when her heart was another's, I offered, if she would aid me in
escaping from the palace, to endeavor to enlist you, as Englishmen, in her
fate, and to prevail upon you to prevent this proposed union which is so
hateful to her and to befriend her in that which her heart desires.'
`You have already deeply interested me in her fate! I noted her sadness
when I was at the palace. Who is her heart's choice?'
`The brave Haroun Almad, the Prince of the Desert. He is a ruler over
thirty tribes, and can bring into the field thirty thousand horsemen. He
is young, handsome and brave, and is devoted to her. He has openly
asked
her hand in marriage of the Dey; but he haughtily refused his consent.
The prince has had one or two secret interviews with the princess, and at
the last which took place on the evening before the arrival of the Tunisian
Embassador, it was planned that on the eve of the solemn Fast of Reza,
which is four days hence, when the Dey and all his court would be
assembled
in the mosque, he would enter the city at the head of his horse and
carry her off. She now mourns her sad destiny, in being given to the Dey
of Tunis before this time comes, and without the means of sending news of
her fate to her lover!'
`Then if this be true, by Saint Paul! she shall not be taken to Tunis in
this ship,' said Belfort warmly. `We will delay our departure till news
can reach this prince!'
`Nay, good Belfort,' said the corsair coming up, for his quick ear had
detected
the sound of the boat alongside, and he had unseen come on deck,
and heard all that passed; `nay, delay would endanger us, if by chance any
English ship of war comes into port. I have heard of this Prince of the
Desert, Haroun Almad. His territories lie a hundred leagues to the south
of this, and approach within twenty of the sea-shore as we progress toward
Tunis. Let the princess and her treasure come on board; this is my
determination
!
then let a messenger be despatched to the prince to come down
to the coast, near the deserted Port of Trabac, where I will land the princess
and deliver her into his arms. From thence, good my lord, I will proceed
whither you will.'
This was spoken cheerfully and with a frankness of demeanor that
deceived
his lieutenant.
`Can we find a messenger?' asked Belfort, doubtfully.
`There is on shore, captain, a moor, Ali Hammel, honest and faithful to
his trusts, whose life I once saved. I will return on shore and seek him out,
and give him such directions as you may suggest,'
`You may be arrested again,' said Belfort.
`The dwelling of Ali is near the sea-shore, and secluded.'
`Then go,' said the corsair. `If you are retaken I will demand your
release
tomorrow of the Dey.'
After some further conversation, Owen Loring, as the young man gave
his name, left the galleon, as he had come on board, without suspecting her
true character. He bore with him orders to Ali Hammel to take horse at
once for the Desert, and instruct the Prince Haroun to meet the ship,
containing
the princess at the Port of Trabac with such retinue as he saw fit.
`You have my thanks, captain,' said Belfort. `I have judged you
wrongfully
in suspecting your motives in taking the princess as passenger. I
confess
to you my repugnance to lawless deeds of blood. I have not forgotten
the pitiful end of the son of the Great Mogul, whom you took passenger and
murdered to possess his treasure!'
`Do you suppose I could murder the princess for her treasure?' asked the
corsair with a smile. `Oh no, my lord, I am getting of your merciful
humor
.
If you sail much longer with me I shall have to carry a chaplain!'
`You are pleased to be ironical. I repeat that I am willing to cruise with
you if you will cruise in the West Indies (if so you refuse to cruise nearer
England) provided you let mercy reign while I am with you. You can
increase
your diamonds without first dipping them in human blood!'
The pirate looked a moment dark and angry, and seemed as if he would
have replied in a terrible tone; but he smiled grimly, and only remarked,
`You seem to have rejoined me, Belfort, to convert me! I can't see what
other motive you have in view! Well; do not try my patience and love for
you
too
far!'
In less than an hour the American returned in safety, reporting that he
had despatched Ali to the Prince Almed on a fleet steed of the Desert.
CHAPTER VIII.
The Embarkation.
The
morning following these events was ushered in by the roar of the
cannon upon the battery of the Dey's castle, in honor of the day of the
bridal
embarkation of the princess. The salutes were returned by the
corsair's
gaffeon; and under clouds of smoke that overhung the harbor, and
amid the ceaseless discharges of artillery, the Dey left the mole in a gilded
caique
, pulled by twenty four slaves dressed in green and gold. Beneath a
canopy of crimson satin reclined the Dey, and near sat the princess, with
her slaves kneeling at her feet. She heeded nothing around her. Her
countenance was sad and eloquently full of the deep sorrow which weighed
upon her heart. She felt that her doom was sealed forever; and that there
was no refuge for her but in death! The two lonely Georgians were her
attendants. Ilda's face expressed all the sympathy of her faithful heart for
her noble mistress. The Dey sat upon his cushioned
dais
in the stern of
the caique, smoking his chebouque in calm and dignified repose, wholly
indifferent
to his daughter's sorrow. He had spoken and she must obey.
Upon the deck of the galleon, which was adorned with flags, stood the
corsair, magnificently attired as an English officer of rank. His chapeau,
his bosom, his fingers, blazed with diamonds and precious stones, so that
the Dey, on beholding him, turned to his vizier, who was in the boat with
him, and striking his majestic beard, exclaimed`Ajaib! wonderful!'
`Mashallah! there is but one Allah! responded the vizier, gravely; and
they saw in each other's eyes an avaricious desire to appropriate the jewels
of the Frangistan captain to their own use. But the Dey knew too well the
power of England to detain a ship which he supposed to belong to her;
though there is but little doubt that he would have invented some pretext
for getting the captain in his power, did he sail under a less powerful flag.
They were received on board of the corsair with marked ceremony; a
sort of swinging bridge, covered with rich carpets, being let down into the
caique for the princess to walk upon. Belfort stood on the right of the
corsair
,
also dressed in a rich suit of velvet, embroidered with gold; and
receiving
the princess, while the corsair received the Dey, he led her to a carpet
spread for her on deck under a handsome canopy. Here she seated herself
with her slaves on either hand. She was not now so indifferent and lost in
her sad thoughts as when in the caique, but her large dark eyes were in
motion as if earnestly searching for some one. The Georgian was also very
eagerly surveying the people on the decks. But they could neither of them
discover the person that they hoped to seethe young American whom
they had assisted to escape! The princess knew he had succeeded in
leaving
the Palace, and the Dey had sent messengers every way to search for
him, swearing by Allah he would take off his head if he were taken.
The princess finding him gone had held on to the slender thread of hope
his departure offered to her grasp; and now wistfully sought him on board.
Not beholding him, she closely scrutinized the face of the corsair to see if
there was in it any feeling of desire to serve her; but it was cold and stern.
The face of the lieutenant seemed to her to express sympathy as she met
his eye, but she feared lest she should be deceived and dared not hope.
In the meanwhile, the bridal treasures of the princess were being brought
on board from the loaded cacique. The corsair in person superintended
the shipping of these valuable parcels, while the Dey, by his side,
ostentatiously
enumerated their names and value, as if desirous of giving the
Infidel
Giaour a large idea of his wealth and magnificence.
`That box contains an aroma vase of sapphire porcelain studded with
diamonds. It is worth four thousand piastres! It was a present to me from
the Sultan.'
`It seems heavy!' answered the corsair.
`Bosh'tis nothing. Here comes a vase of solid gold set with a hundred
and one rubies, each the size of an antelope's eye!'
`What may be the worth of it?'
`Five thousand piastres! Boshbut 'tis nothing.'
`What is this bale your highness?'
`Carpets from Persian looms. There are seven, and each one cost a
thousand golden piastres.'
`You are generous to your daughter, your Highness,' said the corsair with
sparkling eyes.
`Bosh'tis nothing,' answered the Dey with contempt. Here comes on
board something for Frangist eyes to look at!'
`It is a large and heavy package, your Highness. What may it contain?'
`Shawls from the East! There are a round dozen of them, and each is
worth fifteen hundred piastres!'
`You are munificent, noble Dey.'
`Bir chey yok! 'tis a trifle! She is my daughter!'
`Here seem to be boxes containing jewels.'
`They are most rare and beautiful! There are tiaras, and chains for the
neck, and bracelets, and single gems of value. I would not sell them,
Frangist
,
for less than fifty thousand piastres! In those square boxes are golden
moidores and sequins to the amount of eighty thousand Spanish
pesos!
'
The eyes of the corsair betrayed his pleasure. Next followed bales and
packages, containing napkins of muslin, fine as gossamer, and exquisitely
embroidered and fringed with silk and silver; gilded vases to hold
rose-water
;
gold and silver bird-cages containing singing birds; and other
articles
too numerous to detail.
`Inshallah! that's an end!' exclaimed the Dey, as the last parcel was laid
upon the deck. `Now, noble captain of Frangist, you will give me under
your hand and seal a receipt for these packages!'
`That I will do, your Highness.'
`Besides these, I give my daughter one hundred slaves, which I shall
despatch
to Tunis tomorrow by land under proper escort. When you return
to England tell your King how the Dey of Algiers endows his daughter!'
`I will not fail to do so, most noble Dey!' answered the corsair.
`I now entrust to thee, Frangist, my daughter and her bridal portion!
The embassador of Tunis will bear her company with a small retinue; his
other attendants, whom you could not admit on board, will go with the
caravan
.
Now Allah be with thee and cause thee safely to convoy my
daughter
to the Dey of Tunis. When she is safely delivered into his hand, the
embassador will pay the thousand sequins, according to my royal pledge
given thee. Art thou content, Frangist?'
`It is enough. I am content.'
The ceremony of leave taking having passed in due form, the Dey left the
galleon and entered his gilded caique, under the fire of a salute. The sails
of the ship were then loosed, her anchor weighed, and with her topsails
sheeted home, she yielded her bows to the light morning breeze, and was
in a few minutes moving slowly out from under the batteries of the castle.
When the Dey reached the land she was full a mile distant, with her
top-gallantsails
and royals set, and standing majestically out of the harbor. He
ascended the terrace of his pa'ace to watch her, and in two hours she was
scarcely visible on the horizon in the direction of Tunis.
The princess remained on deck watching the towers and minarets of her
native city receding in the distance; and when at length they were lost to
her gaze, she turned away and wept; not so much at her departure from
Algiers, but at the reflection that each moment was now bringing her
nearer
Tunis, which was but four days sail. All at once an exclamation of
joyful
surprise escaped the Georgian's lips. The Princess looked up and heard
her repeat,`The young Frangist gardener!'
She followed the direction of her gaze, and beheld approaching her the
prisoner she had assisted to escape. His face wore a smile of satisfaction.
He approached her and said,
`Noble princess Xerifa, to you I owe my liberty! I have made use of it
to serve you!'
`And yet I am embarked and on my way to Tunis! Thou hast not
served
me, Frangist!' she said in a tone of reproach.
`Having escaped, noble princess, I reached this ship in safety. My first
act was to make known your story to the captain! He listened with interest
and promised to aid you. He advised me to send a messenger to the Prince
of the Desert to meet the ship at the old port of Trabac, a day's sail this
side of Tunis, where he said he would put in and deliver you up to him. I
immediately returned on shore and sought out a faithful man, whom I at
once despatched to the Prince Haroun Almad, with intelligence of your
situation
.
He will reach the prince by tomorrow morning; and in three days,
by the time this ship gets up with Trabac, he will be there to receive you!'
The Princess Xerifa listened with surprise and incredulity. She hardly
dared believe so much good news! Smiles and joy, nevertheless, took the
place of despondency, and her fine eyes kindled with hope. Ilda looked as
if she would have danced with joy. She threw herself at the feet of the
princess and kissed them, and expressed her joy in the most enthusiostic
language.
In the meanwhile, a scene was passing in the cabin in which the princess
was deeply interested. Belfort had seen from the expression of the corsair's
eyes when the treasure came on board, that he determined to appropriate
it. This suspicion was confirmed by the manner in which he disposed of
it. Instead of placing it in the part of the ship which was most
appropriate
for it, he had it conveyed into the cabin and stowed in a place where he
kept his own private treasures. Having thus disposed of it, Kidd locked
the place and placed the ponderous key in his belt. Belfort seeing this
resolved
to make known to him his suspicions.
`I may offend you, captain,' he said firmly; `but I suspect you intend
foul play towards the princess!'
`You won't offend me,' answered Kidd, smiling with a reckless air; `hut
there is not another man who would long keep his head on his shoulders,
who would take the liberties with me you see fit to do!'
`Then I will take the liberty to ask, do you mean to fulfil pour promise to
me, to convey this lady safely to Tunis?'
`Perhaps she prefers landing this side of Tunis!' answered the corsair
with a smile.
`True! I have sent the prisoner whom she assisted in escaping, to make
known to her what has been agreed upon. He is here.'
`Well, sir, what says the princess?' demanded the corsair of the young
American.
`That she has not words to express her gratitude to you for your
proposition
to land her!'
`Then she would not be taken to Tunis?'
`No, captain! She looks forward only to landing at Trabac!'
`Well and good! You may retire! Now, my lord, what say you? Shall
I take the lady to Tunis, or land her at Trabac? Shall I fulfil my promise
to you or not?'
`No, In landing her where she may meet the Prince, or if he does not
come in time, may be sent to him, you will equally meet my wishes!'
`Do I indeed!' he repeated ironically. `I am happy to know I have
succeeded
in pleasing my moral and fastidious lieutenant.'
`You will then leave her at Trabac?'
`Yes.'
`And all her treasures?'
`That is another thing!'
`You will not despoil her of her bridal portion!' said Belfort, with
indignation
flashing from his eyes.
`If this Desert Prince takes her he must take her portionless.
`You pledged your word to me to take her and her treasures in safety
to Tunis!'
Belfort now saw a dilemma of which the wily corsair would not fail
to take advantage.
`I suspected you had an eye to her treasure!'
`I will not take it without her consent!'
`Will you swear to this!'
`Cheerfully! Let her be questioned Call the American to interpret
between
us.'
The young American accompanied them into the presence of the
princess
,
who still remained on deck beneath her canopy.
`Ask her,' said the corsair, `whether she prefers going to Tunis with her
treasures, or landing at Trabac without them. She is at liberty to make
choice of either!'
The American started at this question. He already had his suspicions of
the character of the vessel awakened by some things he had seen seen and
heard on board, and this question seemed to him to confirm them.
Nevertheless
he put the inquiry to the princess.
`If the Frangist captain desires to keep my treasures let him, if he will
safely place me in the hand of Prince Haroun,' she said earnestly, yet not
without a look of surprise cast at the corsair.
`You hear that,' Belfort,' said Kidd, as the American interpreted her
answer
.
`Now you see I am not a robber so bad as you thought. It is a fair
bargain. She considers this Prince Haroun, if fairly weighed, of equal
value with her gold and jewels. I give her the prince for her treasures. It
is a fair exchange, my lord Honesty!'
Belfort bit his lip and was about to reply; when he thought it best to be
silent and for the present let it pass with a smile.
On the morning of the fourth day after leaving Algiers, the corsair arrived
in sight of the ruined fortress of the ancient Port of Trabac. The galleon
was sailing along within half a league of the shore and steering directly for
the haven. The shores were broken into hills covered with verdure,
between
which could be caught glimpses of the vast plains which lose
themselves
in the Great Desert. By this time, Owen Loring pretty well
understood
the character of the vessel in which he had embarked, and in his own
mind resolved if possible to leave her when the princess did; for he felt
he should prefer the desert to the deck of a pirate. But Belfort, who had
seen much of him, discovering his fears and divining his intentions, said to
him privately:
`You are desirous of quitting this vessel at Trabac. It is my wish you
should remain on board. I am your friend and can serve you. I may need
4
your assistance yet here. Remain! Appear to the corsair to be engaged
in his interests, and to fancy particularly the idea of sailing under his flag.
In the meanwhile remain true to me. All are not friends of the corsair who
sail with him. There is a plot on foot for his destruction! I know that you
are brave and of honest princlples. I have confided in you because from
what I have seen in you I know I can trust you. Let the princess depart,
and let the captain retain her treasures. The hour of his judgment is not
far off!'
The young American, reassured by these words, resolved to abide the
issue
,
and stand by the lieutenant who had placed this confidence in him. As
the galleon neared the harbor, both Belfort and Kidd, each with a spy-glass,
closely reconnoitred the shore and the heights beyond; but they could see
nothing moving save a few goats browsing upon the hill-side, and a troop
of wild-asses feeding among the herbage of a rocky ravine. The princess
looked no less earnestly in search of some signs of the presence of the
prince. The ship kept on her course in the harbor, and came to anchor
about a cable's length from the snow-which beach and close by the ruins of
the old Moorish fortress of Trabac.
`If this princely lover does not make his appearance,' said the corsair,
after
surveying the shore with glass, `I know of no other way than to send her
to him!'
`This would only expose her to death; for we have no escort to afford
her,' answered Belfort. `Let us wait a day or two. Perhaps he may be
here before tomorrow! The American assures me of the faithfulness of
the messenger despatched to him. I will go aloft, from whence I can see
over these low hills, and command a view of the plains southward!'
Slinging his spy-glass beneath his arm, Belfort aseended the rigging and
soon reached the main-topgallant-crosstrees. From this position he had a
wide view of the shore, and his sight could penetrate inland for many
miles.
`What do you see?' called out the corsair from the deck, observing him
long and earnestly, and with an eager manner level his glass towards the
south-west.
`I discern a cloud of dust just raised upon the verge of the horizon! It
may, however, be caused by a wind.'
`Oh that it were the dust of Haroun's troop!' exclaimed Xerifa, when the
American had interpreted this in reply to her eager questions.
`Fear not, princess! Although he is not now here, you will without
doubt see him soon!'
`The cloud increases and plainly advances,' said Belfort with animation;
`and I think I can see a dark body moving beneath it!'
`It must be Haroun!' cried Xerifa, when she understood this. `Such is
the appearance of the horseman of the desert, when seen afar off riding
with the wind!'
At eventide, the day after the departure of the messenger from Algiers,
the Prince Haroun Almad was seated upon a gorgeous carpet before the
door of his tent, surrounded by his chiefs and warriors holding a council.
He was informing them of his intention to take to wife the Princess Xerita
the Dey of Algiers' daughter, and that the next morning he should proceed
at the head of a thousand horse towards Algiers. This intelligence was
received
by them with open manifestations of joy, and all pledged themselves
to stand by him with their lives. The prince then rose up and thanked
them with a grace of manner and courtesy of words that singularly
became
him. He was not more than twenty-five, with a noble and
symmetrical
person, fine dark eyes and handsome Arabian features, with an
expression
of pride and independence upon his lip and brow. He was dressed in
a casque of shining steel, inlaid with gold, and shaded by a snowy plume;
he wore a green camesk of silk over a shirt of mail, full Turkish trowsers,
with high scarlet boots of gilded morocco. and golden spurs. His belt
glittered
with diamonds, and in it was stuck a pair of gold mounted pistols
with remarkably long barrels, and suspended from it by chains of silver
swung a flashing Greek yatagan.
He had hardly ceased speaking his thanks to his people, when one of the
mounted videttes, which, for leagues, were kept always posted around the
camp of the prince at certain intervals, came riding in with the intelligence
that a single horseman was galloping towards the camp from the north.
`Advance and meet him, and know who he is, and what is his object in
approaching us!' said the prince.
Three young men instantly sprung upon their horses together, and flew
over the plain at a speed that would have mocked the flight of a falcon.
They were soon seen to meet him and then to let fall the points of their
lances and turn back escorting him to the camp.
`Who comes?' demanded the prince as they came near.
`A messenger from the princess Xerifa,' answered one of the young men.
`Welcome, stranger! What news dost thou bear?'
Ali, though spent with his hundred leagues of hard riding, during which
he had changed horses no less than twelve times, in a few words related
the story. The Prince listened with surprise and a cloud of fierce anger
gathered upon his brow.
`Now, by the soul of the Prophet! this dey of Tunis shall be punished
for his presumption! To horse and let us ride for Trabac. It is three days
journey, but we must leave the ostrich behind in our rapid march!'
At the rising of the moon that night, Prince Haroun started at the head
of three thousand horse, and shaped his course across the desert in the
direction
of the sea.
CHAPTER IX.
The Prince.
`There is no mistaking the origin of that cloud upon the plain now,' said
Belfort. `I can see distinctly beneath it a body of horse and can detect
even the glancing of armor in the sun-light. Now they widen their
columns
and show a very large troop of horse. They are galloping onward at
the top of their speed and each moment their number seems enlarging.
It seems an army of mounted cavalry with more than a hundred camels!'
I see banners waving, and hark! I hear the notes of a bugle!'
`I hear it,' answered the corsair. `Ah, now I see the head of the column
between the hill and the fort. They are not a mile distant! There is no
question but that it is this Prince of the Desert!'
The Princess needed no interpreter now to assure her that her lover was
near. She watched with eager eyes and a glance of hope upon her cheek,
the advancing troop. It soon entered into the defile between the hills and
came thundering down with flaunting banners and resounding clarions,
towards
the sea-shore. Squadron after squadron filed swiftly through the
pass and drew up on the beach; till the whole body of horse drew rein
in a line six deep, fronting the galleon and not a quarter of a mile distant.
It was a noble and spirited spectacle to witness, and was gazed upon in
silent
admiration from the ship.
`He must be a noble fellow, and worthy of the princess, to command
such a fine body of horse,' said Kidd.
`I fear he will object to your keeping her treasure,' said Belfort who was
now again on deck.
`He may object. I shall tell him he must be content with the Princess.
He is a splendid fellow! See him dashing towards the beech to hail us.
Hark! What is that he says?' he demanded of the American.
`He desires to know if the princess Xerifa is on board the ship.'
`Tell him that she is, and that I will send her to him. There is no
question
now but that this is the true lover!'
`None, whatever, if we read aright the happy expression of the face of the
princess,' answered Belfort.
A boat was now let down and ordered along side; a carpet thrown over
the stern and the princess and her slaves (whom Belfort had succeeded in
prevailing on the corsair to suffer to accompany her) with the Tunisian
embassador
were placed in it. Kidd accompanied by Belfort then got in and
took thir seats, and the boat pulled directly for the spot where the prince
awaited to receive them, magnificently attired and mounted upon a charger
that shone with scales of gold. By his side, led by two Ethiopian slaves
was a snow white palfrey for her to ride.
The prince alighted and running forward embraced Xerifa by kissing her
on both cheeks, and then leaning from her to whom she owed her
deliverence
from the hands of the Dey of Tunis, he turned towards the corsair and
expressed his thanks and gratitude with manly warmth and energy; and
taking from his own neck a chain of gold set with diamonds he threw it
over that of the corsair. To Belfort, for the princess did not neglect him, he
also expressed his thanks and forced upon his acceptance his sword studded
with diamonds. To the young American of whose important services he
was informed by the grateful Xerifa he presented a dagger of great value
that literally blazed with jewels.
`These presents,' he said, `are but poor expressions of my gratitude for
the possession of a jewel of priceless value in this fair princess whom you
have brought me. I shall always think of the Frangist with affection and
friendship!'
Desirous of getting off with his treasure before the princess informed him
of its detention (for he knew that the prince might forcibly detain him a
prisoner if he saw fit, till it was restored to the princess) Kidd made a brief
reply and gave orders to put off from the shore. As the boat pushed off the
Tunisian Embassador threw himself into the water to reach it with a look
of great anxiety and terror. He had hardly done so when at a signal from
the prince to whom the princess was explaining who he was, several of his
party spurred into the water and seized him.
`What means this?' cried Kidd in surprise.
`The princess has told who he is,' answered the American, `and the
prince says he shall die. It is this that caused him to run towards the
boat.'
`Let us turn back and demand his life, and that he be sent in safety to
Tunis!' cried Beltort.
`No. Let the prince do with him as he chooses. It will be some
satisfaction
to him to have this little vengeance allowed him. He will feel
bethumored
after it.'
Belfort did not reply; for his attention with that of the corsair was at
once taken up by a scene on the land. The embassador, on being taken
from the water, was led by his captors to the prince, who seemed to
address
him with great anger. He was stripped of his shawl and turban, two
men forced him upon his knees, while a third at a signal from the prince
advanced with a drawn yataghan. The circling weapon flashed in the sun
above his head and the next instant descended upon the neck of the victim,
and the head of the Tunisian Embassador bounded twenty feet distant and
rolled into the waves.
`That prince is a man after my own heart,' said Kidd with a smile. `I am
well pleased that I have done him the service I have, in giving him his
bride.'
`He would have been better pleased had you not first robbed her!'
`I will settle that matter with him, some day when we happen to meet in
the desert.'
They had hardly got on board, when they clearly saw that there was
some new cause of agitation on shore. The prince was riding up and down
the shore talking in a loud tone and pointing towards the galleon with fierce
and animated gestures.
`Listen, American! What is all this?' cried Kidd.
`I can only distinguish the words `pirate'`robber'`treasure!
answered
the young man with some hesitation.
`You can, eh! Well! the prince may bark as much as he lists. I can
laugh at him here!'
`They are manuvring strangely!' said Belfort. `See! the camels are
advancing to the front, and yonder gallops a hundred horse into the fort!
The prince is giving orders with great earnestness.'
`We are beyond their reach. They have no boats and can only buzz,'
said the corsair scornfully laughing.
`I am not so confident they will not harm us! There is a falconet
*
*
A small piece of artillery of two or three pound calibre often used in desert warfare at that
period.
slung on the back of every one of those camels! And see they have found
cannot in the fort and are lifting them into the embrasures! They will yet
do us mischief if we lie here!'
`The moorish dogs! Is this their prince's gratitude?' cried the corsair
roused like a tiger at these demonstrations. `But for you Belfort, I would
have drowned the princess and so had her wealth without claimants. These
howling hounds will yet do damage to my spars if they have powder and
ball to fire those pieces! All hands to get underweigh! Up with the an
chor! Lively, lively! Loose the top-sails and jib, some of ye! Spring to
it! There is just wind enough for steerage way. How far will those
falconets
throw a ball, Belfort?,
There was no need of a verbal reply. He had hardly spoken before a
regular cannonading was opened upon the galleon within cable's length, or
eight hundred feet off the beach, from the falconets slung upon the backs
of the camels which were ranged in a line at a point nearest the ship. The
balls passed through the sails, cut the cordage and shivered the bulwarks,
passing through them wounding and killing the men. Orders were
immediately
given by Kidd to the men who were weighing the anchor to cut the
cable and man the guns. The Arabs in the fort, in the meanwhile,
succeeded
in elevating a heavy gun to the embrasures, and bringing it to bear
upon the galleon, loaded it and filled it with stones instead of ball. Seeing
this, the corsair ordered an eighteen pounder to be levelled at this party and
discharged; but the shot,as the ship was swinging round,fell to far too the left.
The Arabs at the same time discharged their piece and a shower of stones
rattled upon the deck and sides of the galleon, doing an immense deal of
mischief to the spars and rigging and wounding no less than eleven men.
The gun, however, burst at the breech in the discharge, and the pirates had
the satisfaction of seeing half a score of the enemy turning somerset in the
air without head or limbs. The galleon as she swung round to the wind,
fired one after another her starboard guns among the dense body of horse;
but most of the shot flew high above their heads. The falconets in the
mean time kept up an incessant fire, and as they discharged their
blunderbusses
and pistols also,they were in the midst of a tempest of leaden hail for
ten minutes. During this time Kidd paced the deck like an enraged lion.
To attempt to retaliate by landing with his boats, he knew would have been
madness, for he would assuredly have been overwhelmed and cut to pieces!
Flight was his only alternative, and to this he was but little accustomed.
The fire of the small arms first fell short, and but now and then a shot
from a falconet would reach her; for at the last they drove their camels
into
the water up to their backs to get within range. When, at length, Kidd
found himself out of reach of the falconets, he ordered the galleon to be
hove to; and then he prepared to open his broadside upon the enemy, for
he had not yet been able to bring it to bear. But, as if anticipating this, the
Prince on finding his shot no longer reached the ship, commanded his
horse to retire in a body. The corsair, therefore, before his men could man
the guns, saw them to his infinite chagrin, moving rapidly from the beach,
and retreating at full speed through the defiles between the hills. He,
however
,
discharged his pieces, though without any visible effect. In five
minutes
,
the reer of the column had got far beyond reach of his shot, with the
additional advantage, which it had had from the first of its retreating, of
having the fort in a range between them and the ship. From aloft, the
retiring
body of horse could for a long while be seen covering the plain and
advancing southward with glittering scimetars and streaming flags, with the
far off sound of the warlike bugle swelling along the breeze.
`Well, let them go,' said the corsair. I have the treasure and he has the
princess! He is a brave chief and has done well, though to my damage.
We have lost twelve men fairly killed and nineteen wounded. This is a
large number out of a crew of but ninety-four! It will take full two days
to repair damages; and for this purpose we must anchor here!'
`And when we put to sea again, shall I be gratified in my wish?' asked
Belfort.
`Name it, Belfort.'
`To visit the Gibraltar and perhaps the West Indies!'
`Well, I promised you! I will keep it!'
`You will go after no more princesses?'
`No, by mine honor! You may command my movements if you wish it
for the next three months. I am in good humor; for I have been more
successful
than I have been for a year past. The galleon did not yield me as
much gold in her capture as I anticipated. The jewels of the Princess make
it up to me!'
By the following day the galleon had repaired all damages, and set sail
towards the west. On the eighth day afterwards she came in sight of the
Pillars of Hercules, and the same evening at sunset lay becalmed within
two leagues of Gibraltar. The port and shipping were all in sight, and
among the latter several vessels of war.
`What are you watching so earnestly with the glass, my lord?' said the
corsair as he observed Belfort looking long and closely into port.
`Merely seeing what ships are in port,' he answered coloring and slightly
hesitating. He felt that he was betraying himself, and putting down the
glass, he turned away before Kidd noticed his confusion.
`There are too many vessels in harbor for me to venture in,' said Kidd, a
few moments afterwards. `They have no doubt missed their galleon, and
some war vessel will come running down on board of us the first breeze.
Besides, I have no business in Gibraltar. To tell you the truth, Belfort, I
am getting tired of the sea. I am now richrich as I desire to be. I have
a fancy to purchase me some vast domain in the colonies, and under an
assumed
name there dwell, and marry, and build up a noble name for my
posterity
.
I am tired of a buccaneer's life. America is young and ambitious.
She will one day cast off her allegiance, and I will be a leader in it. If you
still fancy to roam the sea in quest of adventure, I will, on reaching the
Americas,resign to you my command!'
`I have no desire to follow the dangerous career of a corsair, I have told
you. I but resumed it, from misanthropy and attachment to you. My heart
as you see is not in it!'
`That I plainly perceive. You are overrunning with the milk of
humanity
.
You have almost made me loth to shed a man's blood; yet I have not
been backward at this in my day. This idea of settling in the colonies has
long taken my fancy; and I meant to carry it out when I got wealth enough.
There is an island of great extent on the south of New England, possessing
a genial climate which I desire to obtain. Now I will sail with you to the
West Indies, according to my promise, and after falling in with some
English
merchantman, I will capture her, sink the galleon, and so run into New
York in the new vessel, representing myself as an India merchant of great
wealth. If I go in in the galleon I shall be suspected, as the news of her
capture at Corsica will spread over the world. At all events I must get rid
of the galleon and take another vessel!'
`Will you promise, for my sake, to touch at Jamaica first?'
`Yes, though it is a great risk. There is an English squadron usually
cruising about there, and I should be sorry to be captured just as I am
making
plans for leading an honest life. But I will do it, as I promised you!
Moreover, I have fifty thousand dollars in kegs on the Kingston head, in
the sand, which I wish to recover! But the wind is springing up! and there
is a Spanish vessel of war getting underweigh! Let us take the first
fannings
of the breeze to leave the rock behind! It is well there is no English
man-of-war in port, or we should have been boarded by her boats long ago!'
The galleon caught the breeze and setting her sails to it, stood westward
into the Atlantic Ocean. The next morning the rock of Gibraltar was just
visible like the faint outline of a cloud peering above the horizon.
Thirty four days after leaving the straits the galleon came in sight of the
mountains of Jamaica, having fallen in with no vessel during the passage.
Gradually as it approached the island the blue highlands assumed a green
tint, and forests and fields were delineated by the eye, and as the distance
each moment lessened, villas and hamlets became distinguishable to the
unassisted vision. The port of Kingston was in sight three leagues more
southwardly, and with a glass the shipping could be seen at anchor in the
harbor.
`I am willing to run down the coast within a league of the town, and
then come to at dark to give you an opportunity to go on shore, while I
unearth
my kegs of dollars hid there three years ago,' said Kidd. `I shall
recommend to you every caution. I will be busy with my boats, bringing
the money while you are at the city. You see I am placing every confidence
in you; for, my good lord, I have conceived, I hardly know in what way, a
suspicion of your good faith. You have not seemed the man you once were
since you have been with me this second time. By the rood; you should
have remained on shore and not brought to me such a dull visage!
Something
is on your mind, and you do not often smile. I have suspected, to
tell you frankly, that you were planning a mutiny and wished to take
possession
of the ship and put me out of the way. But I have sounded the
men and find you are not a favorite with any of them. There is not a man
of them but has doubts whether you are a
true man
among us!
Nevertheless
I think I know you, and that you would not deceive me. I let you go
on shore to see your old friends as you desire, while I get my money on
board! I would go with you, but I am too well known in the streets of
Kingston, if anything should detain me till daylight!'
`What reason have I given you to suspect me?' asked Belfort, calmly.
`What is it you fear from me?'
`Nothing, now! I do not fear you will betray my presence here to any
English man-of-war, for you are as much implicated as myself. I have only
had suspicions of your desire to supplant me in my command!'
`This has been farthest from my thoughts,' answered Belfort.
The ship was hove to, the boat was brought alongside, and Belfort got
into
it. Kidd also sprung in after him, intending to land with six men at tke
point a mile this side of the entrance to the post, to dig for his kegs, while
Belfort proceeded on foot across the promontory to the town. It was
already
dark when the boat set out from the ship; and as it landed at the
place designated by the corsair, the moon had risen and poured a flood of
light upon the scene of ocean, rocks, castle and distant town, with the dark
blue mountains in the distance.
`Ho! whither do you go, American?' cried the corsair, as Owen Loring
started off to follow Belfort on his expedition. `Remain here!'
`I should prefer he would accompany me,' said Belfort.
`I prefer he should remain! I should never lay eyes on him again, and
I find him too useful as a clerk to let him go. Stay here, young man, and
take fair account of the kegs as they are unearthed!'
Belfort looked closely at the face of the corsair, as well as he could see
its expression by the moonlight, to ascertain if this step was occasioned by
suspicion. But he could discover nothing to lead him to believe so; though
well knowing the pirate captain had good grounds for suspecting both of
them of treachery. After a moment's hesitation, Belfort proceeded on his
way alone, after first glancing at the young man, and conveying to him a
look of encouragement. Belfort soon disappeared over the hill, for he well
knew the path and the pirates proceeded to dig for their treasure midway
between two rocks, beneath a cocoa tree growing upon the edge of the
beach and bank.
The place pointed out by the pirate was thoroughly dug without success.
Several other points were searched with equally fruitless results, when he
finally commanded the men to cease their labors, being satisfied that some
of his former officers had been before him! This conviction by no means
increased his good humor, and without waiting for Belfort he resolved to
return on board. As he entered the boat a paper upon the bottom of it caught
his eye. He took it up and discovered that it was an envelope, addressed
simply to `Mr. Belfort.' A heavy seal was attached to it, but broken. He
opened it and by the moonlight read as follows:
Admiralty, London
.
May
2d, 1700.
Sir
,By command of His Majesty, I enclose you a despatch to the
captains
or commanders of any vessels of war lying in the port of Gibraltar,
Spain, or Kingston in Jamaica, or wherever these despatches may find
them, to put themselves under your directions, for the purpose expressed in
their instructions, viz: the capture of the freebooter, William Kidd, and
bringing him (if possible) to trial, in this our England. Trusting that you
will be successful in taking him, through the aid of His Majesty's vessels of
war, and that you will prove yourself worthy in all respects of the
confidence
His Majesty has graciously seen fit to repose in you, I am, &c. &c.
Signed,
Abington
.
When Kidd had finished reading this, he sprung to his feet as if he had
been bitten by a serpent. He examined the envelope for more writing, and
then looked round for any other papers that might have been dropped by
Belfort.
`Ah, ha!' he muttered through his shut teeth. `So I have it! This is his
purpose, hey? the arch-traitor! For this he left England and sought me at
Gibraltar! For this he has joined me again, sailed with me, and urged me
to cruise about England, and then when I refused, to sail hither! This is
his treacherons friendship! I have not suspected him without cause! He
has stuck to me till he could bring me into the snare I must be seized and
carried to England forsooth! This is the wish of His Majesty. He would
be sure that it is myself and no counterfeit. He would give the world
assurance
that I am fairly caught, and hung at Tyburn! Well, well! good
master Belfort! I have discovered this treason in good time. I would wait
for thee and cause thee to swing for this at my fore-yard, did I not fear
being
pounced upon by a British cruiser. There is no question now why you
should go ashore at Kingston! It is doubtless to send a frigate after me!
Bueno! they must have a long chase if they would catch me! Ho! men
on board! a-board! We have had a traitor among us! Pull for the ship!
In less than an hour we shall have a British frigate or two coming round the
point walking after us with my lord Belfort on her deck! By the mass! I
would I had discovered this conspiracy while he was in my power!'
The boat shot across the moonlit waves at a rapid rate, and in half an
hour Kidd stood once more upon his quarter-deck. In a few words he
briefly informed his officers and men what he had discovered, and the
probability
,
as British vessels of war were always lying in Kingston, of being at
once pursued. The crew growling forth deep imprecations against
Belfort
,
aided in making sail, for Kidd had ordered everything to be set that
she could carry.
`Did you know ought of this treachery?' demanded Kidd of the young
American, after the ship was under full sail standing northward.
`No, captain,' answered the young man firmly.
`It is well you are innocent! But it is not likely he would have a
confidant
!
Yet you were much in conversation, and my slave Cinqua told me
he heard you say you would escape the first opportunity.'
`It is natural I should wish to revisit my home after two years captivity,'
answered the young colonist. `I have a mother and sisters, and also one
dearer to whom I was betrothed!'
`Well! if we are successful in escaping the pursuit, you may yet see
them soon! I am going to run for New England, and in some obscure bay
ground the galleon, and thence reach Boston with my treasures!'
Kidd now swept his night-glass along the shore, southward, in the
direction
of the port, and seeing nothing that looked like a sail in pursuit, he
began thoughtfully to pace his quarter-deck, meditating upon the
surprising
treason of Belfort, and upon his own future prospects.
CHAPTER X.
The Last of the Galleon.
Belfort
reached the town in less than half an hour after quitting the
party of pirates. Familiar with the place he proceeded at once to the
residence
of the British Consul, and was ushered into his presence. Without
saying a word to him he handed him a letter, addressed,
`
To any of His Majesty's Consuls abroad
.'
The consul opened it and read as follows:
Sir
;You are hereby desired to furnish such information respecting
British
vessels in your waters, as the bearer, Mr. Belfort, may have occasion to
require on the secret service in which he is engaged, and also to further
his purposes, which he will make known to you, with every aid at your
command.
Signed,
Abington
,
Admiralty Office
.
`Mr. Belfort, you may command me! How can I serve you?' answered
the consul.
`Is there any British vessel of force in port?'
`There is the Serapis 74, and the frigate Queen Anne; besides two sloops
of twenty guns, and the brig Nettle of sixteen!'
`The frigate and brig will be both requiredone for shoal water,' he
answered
.
`The service I desire them for I will briefly make known! I am
one of the young officers, who, with William Kidd, declared ourselves free
from any allegiance to the crown, and madly hoisted the free flag! As I am
of a noble family, and am heir to the title of Earl of , and as I, three
years ago, left Kidd voluntarily, and have since lived a life of retirement, the
King has graciously condescended to pardon my offences past, on condition
I would enter into a plan to betray the pirate chief, with whom I had
formerly
sailed. This I promised His Majesty, at a personal interview with
which he honored me, that I would do if in my power. His Majesty was
pleased, after hearing my plan, to recommend me to the Admiralty, from
whom I have received letters to command the aid of any ships that should
be in those seas where I might find Kidd. Armed with these letters I left
England, and after some some search found Kidd near Gibraltar. Under
pretence of wishing to unite my fortunes with his again, I joined his ship,
into which he gladly received me After some difficulty I have succeeded
in bringing him and his vessel into the vicinity of a British station. I could
have arrested him before or slain him, but it is His Majesty desire he and
his vessel should be captured, and himself taken to England for execution.
With great art and not a little danger of leading him to suspect my motives,
I have induced him to come into these waters. His vessel is now lying to,
within a league of the port to the northward. I have left him not an hour
since. He and a party of his men are on shore, not half a league from this
place, digging up some treasure he left there three years ago. He expects
me to return and go on board with him by midnight! I now want a party
of troops to surprise him there, while a vessel gets underweigh to take his
vessel!'
The consul listened with unfeigned surprise at this relation. `You
deserve
all praise, sir, and have shown yourself worthy of His Majesty's
confidence
.
The detachment you require shall at once be sent. How many
men has he with him?'
`Six.'
`I will send a company. Designate the place!'
`That part of the beach north of the Head, where a single cocoa grows
by itself. The money they dig for is beneath the tree!'
`I know the spot!'
The consul immediately despatched a servant with a note to the barracks,
and in a few moments the Colonel waited upon him, to whom he
communicated
the duty required.
`I will command in this matter myself,' answered the officer, leaving the
apartment.
`Now I will accompany you on board the frigate,' said the consul. `My
barge is manned and in waiting.
On reaching the `Queen Anne,' Belfort was introduced to the captain,
Sir Charles Percy, to whom he presented a letter from the Admiralty. Sir
Charles read it with surprise, and surveyed the bearer with curiosity. The
consul then briefly made known to him the narrative of events which had
been communicated to him by Belfort. The English captain was no
sooner
made acquainted with the fact, that the notorious buccaneer Kidd, the
`King of the Sea,' was lying within four miles of him, than he was all
animation
.
He seized his trumpet, and, to the astonishment of officers and
men, gave orders to get underweigh. The consul, at the same time, was
desired to pass in his boat to the brig Nettle, and communicate orders to
weigh and follow the frigate.
But with all this despatch on the part of the vessels of war, the corsair
had regained the galleon, and defeated not only the ambition of the colonel
and his party to secure him; but, before the frigate got clear of the
harbor
,
he was stretching away, under all his canvass, to the north, with his
yards squared.
As the dawn began to break, the corsair eagerly inspected the southern
horizon with his glass, and, as the light increased, he saw gradually
delineated
against the sky, the tall hamper of a large ship of war, and near her
a taunt, rakish looking brig. Both were under press of sail and standing
after the galleon being now about eight miles distant. As the sun rose,
Kidd went aloft, and with his spy-glass distinctly made them out to be a
a large English frigate and a brig of war. He felt now satisfied that Belfort
had brought his treachery to a consummation. Descending to the deck, he
gave orders to set all the light sails and studden-sails on both sides. This
additional canvass he saw forced the galleon through the water at great
speed. But the frigate, which he watched closely, he saw did not fall astern,
but came dashing on with `a bone in her teeth,' at the rate of nine knots;
for the breeze was now blowing fresh.
The corsair paced his deck with a dark and angry brow. The treachery
of his lieutenant aroused all the fierce resentment of his unbridled nature.
He saw that he was so successfully betrayed by him, that he could escape
only by flight. The idea of fighting with a frigate and brig he felt was
madness. His only alternative was to trust to the fast sailing of his galleon
with the hope of escaping in the night or in a storm. Having set every thing
drawing that the ship would carry he went below, and locking his cabin
door on the inside, he began to open his treasures. Countless and priceless
in value were the jewels which he took from his casket and placed
compactly
together in small packages, which he enclosed in a belt. Having
loaded this with as many as it could contain, he bound it securely about his
person, underneath his inner vest. He then counted his gold coin into
heaps and filled canvass bags with it, which he packed in a heavy oaken
chest. He then avariciously surveyed the treasure an instant, locked the
chest, and placed the key in his belt.
`If I am taken, the sea shall have thee before the hand of man can grasp
thee!' he said, addressing the gold. `If I am likely to be taken, the galleon
and all it contains shall sink beneath the waves! My hoards shall make no
man rich! For these treasures I have scoured the seas and mingled human
blood with the briny foam. For these I have defied human laws and made
my name a by-word for crime! For these I have sold my soul to hell and
shaken hands with the Fiend! No man shall profit by what has been my
ruin! If I perish, all I have taken in exchange for human blood shall
perish
with me!'
`Sir, the brig gains on us,' said his mate, calling from the
companionway
.
`Yes,' he muttered, `I see how it is! My doom is sealed! Belfort has
been commissioned by Destiny to betray me to death! I did not fear
before
him in my heart without cause! If I had obeyed the instinct which
prompted me to fear and suspect him, and thrown him into the sea, I should
not now be flying from my enemies. I shall be taken! I see that. My fate
is woven and the last thread is broken! I feel the weight of this idea upon
my soul. I have no spirit to meet and defy my foes! I feel like a coward
who would fly before them so that he could escape with life! Avarice and
love of life have taken hold of my being. I desire only to escape with my
jewels! The vast trrasure of the princess I must leave too!' At this
momoment
the deep boom of artillery started him!
`The frigate is firing, sir,' said the mate, `but as she is four miles off the
shot has fallen short.'
Kidd sprung to the deck and looked to windward. The frigate had gained
upon him in the hour he had been below among his gold, and was now but
a little more than a league distant to windward. The brig was a little
nearer
and both pressing after him and crowding all their canvass.
`Cast overboard the four forward guns starboard and larboard!' shouted
Kidd in a voice of thunder. `We have twenty-two of them and can spare
a few!'
In ten minutes the guns with their carriages had been hoisted over the
bulwarks and plunged into the sea.
`That lightens her by the head a little,' he said, after watching for a
moment
or two the effect. `We must make her do better still! Bear a hand
and send the guns amidships, two on each side, after the others! There
she flies forward!' he cried with an elated tone, as he saw the increased
speed with which she moved through the water! He watched the vessels
astern with intense interest, and was soon satisfied that the galleon was
widening
the distance that separated them. After half an hour's time he was
convinced that she was running away from both. This idea filled him with
the hope that he should yet succeed in making his escape. He saw with
satisfaction a dark cloud gathering over the sea to the south-east, and knew
that a storm would be upon them by night, when they would be compelled
to take in sail and look more to themselves than to him. As he foresaw,
towards
the close of the day, a gale of wind burst upon them. The frigate
got it first and took in all her light sails. The brig, standing on, carried
away her fore-topgallant sail. In a few moments afterwards it fell upon the
galleon; but the corsair, who was as good a seaman as he was a hold
buccaneer
,
had prepared his vessel for it, and it broke over them without doing
injury, and bore the galleon forward upon its wings with appalling velocity.
The frigate was soon lost to the eye of the pirate, and, triumpling in this
division in his favor, he let his ship drive. The storm lasted for several
days, during which he had flown like the wind many hundred miles through
several degrees of latitude. Twice during this interval he had seen a vessel
far astern, scudding, but in the obscurity of the tempest, could not tell
whether
she was the frigate or a stranger, in his wake. On the weather clearing
off, Kidd found himself in the latitude of Bermuda, and within four days
sail of New York bay. Thither he now determined to run, satisfied that
he had effectually eluded the pursuit of the frigate. On the morning of the
fifth day he came in sight of Block Island, on the eastern end of Long
Island
;
and after running eastward a few leagues, he came to anchor near
Gardner's island on the north side, having first satisfied himself that no
British
or Dutch vessels of war were cruising in the vicinity.
As soon as he dropped anchor, which was about three in the afternoon,
on the eleventh day after leaving Jamaica, he pulled ashore and landing
upon
the beach, openly waited on the proprietor, informed him who he was,
and that he had a large amount of treasure he wished to bury and to leave
with him to protect, but for the security of it he would make him answer
with his life.
Reluctantly the proprietor of this beautiful island of the sound, received
his treasures as he landed them, and gave him, at his demand, a receipt for
them.
*
*
This receipt is now extant and is as follows:
`No. 1.
One bag of dust gold.
2.
One bag of coined gold.
And one in silver.
3.
One bag dust gold.
4.
One bag of silver rings, and sundry precious stones.
5.
One bag of unpolished
stones.
6.
One piece of crystal,
cornelian rings, two
agates, 2 amethysts.
7.
One bag silver buttons
and lamps.
8.
One bag of broken silver.
9.
One bag of gold bars.
10.
One do.
11.
One bag of dust gold.
12.
One bag of silver bars.'
Before, however, the buccaneer could land that more valuable portion of
his treasures, of which he had robbed the princess Xerifa, two vessels
appeared
in sight, at which he took the alarm, and hastening on board the
galleon
,
made all sail up the sound. The vessels proved afterwards to be
merchant
ships, and more likely to fly from him than that he should fly from
them. But suspecting that they were the frigate and brig, and his fears too
much aroused to wait to ascertain, he at once crowded sail to escape. The
next evening he passed down through Hurl Gate, and in two hours
afterwards
,
after satisfying himself that there were no vessels of war in New
Amsterdam, as New York was then called, he boldly dropped anchor
between
the battery and Governor's Island. He immediately went on shore
and waited on the Governor, Lord Bellamont, to whom, speaking in broken
English, he represented himself as a Spanish captain, who had been driven
from his course by storms, and put into New York bay for provisions and
water; of which the corsair was indeed in great want. While his lordship
was courteously conversing with him, and promising to send on board such
provisions as he required, a rumor came that a frigate was in sight, coming
up the harbor. Without ceremony Kidd sprung to his feet and hastened to
the quay, where his boat lay; and immediately leaping into it, he pulled on
board his ship. The frigate was not three miles off, standing up the harbor
with English colors flying. A glance at her told the corsair that it was the
frigate that had put out after him from Kingston. Before he got on board
he shouted aloud his orders to loosen the sails and cut the cable. He sprung
upon deck and inspiring his men to exertion, the galleon in four minutes
was wearing round to the wind, and soon was moving before it.
`What shall be done?' asked his chief officer.
`The wind is south and we cannot escape to sea. We must run before it
up North River. The frigate cannot follow as far as I dare lead! At the last
I can sink the galleon or run her ashore! There is no alternative! This
fellow
tracks us like a sleuth hound. The brig I hope has gone to the bottom!
`No! there she comes in a league astern!' said the man, at this moment
discovering her.
`Then the devil has favored them. When he gets against me in this
game I may as well give up beaten! We must run her up the river as high
as we can, and then ground her and burn her, getting on shore as much
treasure as possible!'
The officers of the frigate, on entering the harbor and discovering with
their glasses the galleon riding at anchor, could scarcely believe the
evidence
of their senses. Not having seen her since the storm, they suspected
she had gone down, though they stood on with a faint hope that she might
have rode out the long tempest, and reached the destination which Belfort
had previously learned from Kidd he intended to make.
`Now, my lord,' said Sir Charles Percy to Belfort; `we have earthed the
fox, and will soon have him! See! he has discovered us and is running
for it!'
`He takes the river up!' cried Belfort. There is no escape for him now!
His fate is sealed!'
`And you will then have fairly earned your Earldom and estates, my
friend,' said Sir Charles. `We are within range I think. Let us send a
shot and measure our distance! This is the luckiest thing in the world,
falling in with the chase here!'
The frigate finding her shot reach, kept up a quick and well-directed fire
upon the galleon, which she returned from her stern guns with
considerable
effect. The frigate, however, soon finding that she lost distance by
firing
,
ceased and crowded sail. The brig, in the meanwhile, having
discovered
the enemy, pressed ahead and joined in the chase. The galleon kept
on about two miles ahead, still standing up the river and sailing at about six
knots with the wind nearly aft. Night fell upon them at least ten leagues
up the river, and yet neither the frigate nor brig had come within
pointblank
range. At intervals they would fire a shot, which would be returned
by the corsair. In this manner they entered, about ten o'clock at night,
among the dark wild mountains of the Highlands. The shadows of the
overhanging precipices made the night blacker, and rendered the pilot
unable
to distinguish the land from the water. Suddenly, while running
beneath
the towering crag of Dunderbergh, the corsair felt a shock through
his vessel, which told him that she had struck upon a rock. He had just
come to the determination that if he would escape, he must run his vessel
ashore. She had hardly struck when some of the men from below rushed
on deck crying that the ship was going down! He heard torrents of
water
rushing into the hold, as they spoke, in confirmation of their words.
`Belfort has conquered!' he said in a deep tone. `We are sinking men!'
he cried out, `but the shore is at hand! Let every man save himself!'
His order was instantly obeyed. The pirates seizing their bags of gold
and silver, and jumped into the water to swim ashore.'
`I can save nothing but what is in my belt; but,' he said with a sort of
bitter satisfaction,' what I leave no man shall possess after me! Is the ship
clear?' he called in a voice of thunder. There was no reply from any one
on board. Every man had left the fast-sinking galleon. As he called she
surged heavily and fell broadly onher side, and seemed to stick fast! `This
will not do! If the deep waters here will not receive her and my
treasures
fire shall befriend me!'
As he spoke he struck a light and throwing combustible materials into
the cabin he ignited them. He was compelled to rush to the deck,so sudden
was the spreading of the fierce element he had called to his aid. The flames
shot out of the cabin windows, and poured upward through the sky-light,
while dark volumes of smoke rolled from the companion-way!
`Farewell, good ship!' he cried as he prepared to leap into the water.
`It will be long before I tread a deck again!'
The frigate had held on in the pursuit until the night had veiled the
chase from her sight, and still she kept steadily on her way, occasionally
firing, and burning blue lights at intervals to reveal the pirate to their view.
But Kidd did not fire after dark, lest the flash should show them where he
was; and it had been his intention to double upon them in the darkness, and
passing them so escape out to sea. But the blue lights which the frigate
sent up, which cast the glare of noon for a moment upon every place
within a league, showed him that this course was out of the question. He
therefore determined to run his vessel on shore, when she struck, as has
been narrated. Sir Charles and Belfort were walking the deck together,
and speaking of the vast amount of treasure which Kidd had in possession
on board the chase, when all at once they saw a bright flame shoot up into
the air, and flash along the waters.
`By St. George! the fellow has set his ship on fire!' cried Sir Charles.
`She is evidently ashore from her position,' cried Belfort. `See how the
flames dart upward and outward! The cliff overhanging them is all
illuminated
!
She is close in with the land!'
`They have stranded her and set her on fire! Crowd on all sail, Mr.
Berry
,'
he cried to the first lieutenant. `We must reach her in time to
extinguish
the flames and preserve his booty!'
The frigate, however, with all her canvass, was unable to reach her in
time. The flames swept along the decks, curled up the masts, and every
rope became a line of fire. The heat discharged gun after gun, the echoes
of which reverberated like thunder among the dark mountains around.
Suddenly the bright flames were enveloped in a dense volume of blackest
smoke, and the next instant, amid the deafening roar of the explosion of
the magazine, the air was filled with myriads of flaming fragments, which
circling in wide arcs fell like shooting meteors into the river,and were
extinguished
in sudden night.
`There is the end of the Pirate's ship at least!' said Sir Charles, turning
to Belfort.
`No doubt of his treasure too!'
`Yes. There is no doubt that it has gone down with it!' answered the
English captain in an accent of chagrin and vexation.
There remains but little now to be told. Landing the next morning
at the place where the hull of the galleon had sunk, Belfort learned from
the Dutch inhabitants, that Kidd and his men had taken to the forests and
said they should pursue their way to Boston through the wilderness.
Thither
Sir Charles sailed without delay, and Belfort had the satisfaction, nine
days afterwards, of arresting Kidd in person at a low inn in Ann street,
where he passed as an English captain, who had lost his ship in the Sound.
The resentful and bitter denunciations of the pirate upon the head of
Belfort
,
may be more readily conceived than we can repeat them. The corsair,
bound in chains, was taken in the frigate to England, tried, executed, and
hung in chains, in Execution Dock, the 12th of May, 1701. Belfort
received
the thanks of the crown, and as the Earl of , afterwards married
the beautiful Spanish maiden, Dona Elena, after having rescued her and her
treasures from the hands of the cruel and avaricious prior, father
Eustaquio
,
who had, subsequently, imprisoned her, and took possession of her
wealth. Belfort, by means of one of the crew of the galleon, whom he met
with in London, had heard of her being there, and also of the half a million
which Don Ferdinand, her father, had placed in the priest's hands! How
he chartered an armed vessel and sailed to Corsica; and how he discovered
Dona Elena shut up in one of the deepest dungeons of the monastery; and
how her gratitude to him, and his interest in her, on both sides became
love
;
and how he punished father Eustaquio, by casting him into the same prison,
from which he had released her, with many more interesting incidents and
adventures which grew out of his expedition to Corsica, we must forbear
relating as we should be happy to do, if the limits of our pages would
permit
.
We, therefore, having brought our corsair to the end of his career,
take leave of the kind reader, with many thanks for his patience in giving
us his good company to the end of our story.
THE END
.Dated at San Elisco, (
Corsica
)
June
28, 1700.
Most-Noble and Powerful Catholic Prince,
Emperor and Lord!
It is my painful duty to communicate to your Highness, the loss, by
capture
,
in our bay of El Gancho on the morning of the 25th instant, of Your
Majesty's Galleon `La Reina Isabel.' This ship was driven into the
Mediterranean
by an adverse gale and afterwards prevented by a corsair from
regaining her port, being chased until she run for shelter, three nights ago
into our secluded bay. Here she was attacked and defended with great
courage, so that she sunk the corsair's vessel, who boarded the Galleon in
boats, and after a hard fight succeeded in capturing her. Among the slain
were the captain with all his officers, and El Escelentissimo Senor Don
Ferdinand de Garcia, who with his daughter were passengers. Previous to
the attack, Don Ferdinand removed for safe keeping to our priory, one
million
of specie belonging to your majesty, which I hold in trust at your
majesty's
command. He left on board the galleon half a million which there
was not time to remove, which fell into the hands of the corsair Kidd, who
has possessed himself of the captured vessel and, after repairing her, sailed
from the island in her, doubtless bent on further deeds of rapine.
I further inform your highness that Don Ferdinand landed half a million
in specie, belonging to himself, which I have also in the priory vaults. His
daughter, who was fortunately landed before the attack is now here under
our protection, and will take measures for the transportation to Spain of
herself
and of her father's wealth.
Your most Sacred Majesty's very humble servant, who kisses the royal
feet and hands yf your majesty.
Eustaquio
,
Prior
.Admiralty, London
.
May
2d, 1700.
Sir
,By command of His Majesty, I enclose you a despatch to the
captains
or commanders of any vessels of war lying in the port of Gibraltar,
Spain, or Kingston in Jamaica, or wherever these despatches may find
them, to put themselves under your directions, for the purpose expressed in
their instructions, viz: the capture of the freebooter, William Kidd, and
bringing him (if possible) to trial, in this our England. Trusting that you
will be successful in taking him, through the aid of His Majesty's vessels of
war, and that you will prove yourself worthy in all respects of the
confidence
His Majesty has graciously seen fit to repose in you, I am, &c. &c.
Signed,
Abington
.Sir
;You are hereby desired to furnish such information respecting
British
vessels in your waters, as the bearer, Mr. Belfort, may have occasion to
require on the secret service in which he is engaged, and also to further
his purposes, which he will make known to you, with every aid at your
command.
Signed,
Abington
,
Admiralty Office
.